It’s also an achievement/award I very much plan to get on my future Pandaran Monk just because it’s only fitting to do so.
I would feed her for forty to sixty minutes (sometimes longer) and eventually, she would fall asleep. Ten minutes to an hour later, she was up again crying. Since I had just fed her, I did not think she needed to nurse again so soon. I tried everything I could think of to calm her but nothing worked. When I ran out of options and could not think of anything else to do, I tried to nurse her again, and sure enough, Livi calmed down and happily suckled away.
Instead of pointing out that they could find each of the items on her list at Meg’s apartment, Sara and Trish shopped. Norma knew the distraction would do both her girls good. She remembered all too well what it was like. Having a close loved one face the hazards of the job tended to make spouses of cops feel the edges of mortality. Norma was pleased with her decision to have them shop. As her crochet hook and yarn continued to flow into a pattern, Norma plotted over what she could give them to do next.
"No, but he was upset."
The 24-year-old three-times World Player of the Year, who now has 54 goals for in all-competitions for club and country this season, broke the mark set by Cesar Rodriguez in the 1940s and 50s in his 314th appearance.
God uses what we do and what others do good or bad to glorify himself if we trust in him. Joseph did not plan his life he simply lived a day to day existence and God used it for his glory! If we trust God no matter what may come against us God will bring us to where he can use us. No plan or purpose driven plan is needed.
Hello everyone and welcome to our Ninth challenge here at Hookedoncraft and thanks to all who entered our Eighth challenge.
So lack of guns does not lead to a peaceful community; just look at Washington, D.C. which has an astronomical crime rate and strict gun laws. Still, it's in the air: the media are on one of their anti-gun crusades, and they are doing that in lockstep with the current regime, which would love to diminish and ultimately do away with our Second Amendment rights.
Ok, now that was how I “used to” post… I am going to have to find a happy medium between 11 000+ words and Dot point with photos…
Officers will be allowed to wear their present Uniform till the 1st of June 1796.
The index, according to the executive summary released with the report:
I included the following photo because the sky was actually this blue. I LOVE this combination of the bright green leaves against the bright blue sky.
The dogs and I kept an eye on the raccoons for the rest of the afternoon and then at dusk I went out with my hubby’s super industrial sized flash light. You could land aircraft with this light it is so bright. Once they started to stir I kept the light focused on them, and yes they were so cute. They were playing up in the trees and jumping from branch to branch but they did not like the light and soon came out of the trees on to the back fence and slowly made their way to the next yard where I think they have been living. At one point the second raccoon to make his exit turned around to face me. I made a very quick dash for the sliding door and stood there until all three of them were out of sight.
Jordan is a fabulous country
This plan is known as the Newbie Blogger Initiative. The idea is simple–get a bunch of experienced bloggers together to encourage new ones. There are over 60 bloggers from all corners of the gaming blogosphere signed up.
(Written on November 24, 2010)
My daughter takes her first AP test tomorrow morning and she’s been staying after school every day until 4 o’clock in study sessions for over a month.. She is prepared and no matter how well she does I’m proud of her too. For us. For making it this far.
Today is Farm Fresh Friday so please scroll up to view our awesome SKETCH CHALLENGE this week by Farmer Larisa :)
paint laundry room
He is going back to his hometown today. I doubt he would ever read this but have a safe journey, ngok. May God always be there for you. Lots of love from your ‘kontot’. Haha!
5. Fill the buttered molds about 3/4 full, In either a rectangular molds metal or silicone
DiS: You put out two vinyl releases last weekend for Record Store Day. Do you see Record Store Day as being an important fixture on the calendar bearing in mind internet downloads have surpassed physical sales in the market?
A hydroelectric dam converts potential energy (and/or kinetic energy) to electrical energy by means of a turbine and alternator.
332 (2)
1. Your Gchat conversation is always open, and you can send links back and forth with no explanation (not even an emoticon). And he knows it’s in his best interest to click on it in a timely fashion.
My plan is once I perfect a basic whole wheat I can also start to add in whole grains and seeds. Hopefully with some trial and error I will have bread that will replace store-bought that will be both cheaper and healthier. I like knowing exactly what is going into the food I am eating.
Cloudline Pinot Noir 2008
As mentioned in my “God Jul” post, there were a plethora of vegetable dishes. The two I made were the “Marinated Ruby Red Salad” and the “Dairy Free Creamed Spinach.” Ivan was my inspiration for the former, as Eastern Europe is very big on pickled and marinated veggies. The latter was something I replicated from my first ever Julbord when we were in Sweden, only I wanted to have an edge on the dish. Both are wonderful winter side dishes to have when you’re in that veggie rut. Where one is refreshing, the other is comforting. Where one is light, the other is rich and filling.
Mantel has used her considerable imaginative powers to explore the domestic background, i.e. the female perspective, of these figures during those whirlwind years while sticking to the original script as laid down by historical events.
Before you read this, bear in mind that this is without a doubt the strangest thing I have ever written.
Instead of growing roses on this trellis, I'll be growing inspiration by changing what's displayed with the seasons and holidays ~ and now all those little bits of art and crafts and miniature treasures that used to hide in the drawer can be enjoyed up close!
There's only three tracks here, so you're either 'in for another long raga' as Krusty the Clown would say, or you're not. If you're down for this kind of thing, this album is an affair with lots of color added to the general raga vibe courtesy of the shehnai. I enjoy the whole thing, but honestly, I don't know enough about classical Indian to really distinguish much between the tracks. They all seem to more or less go down the same sonic path - but the trail is clearly being led by master musicians.
"Oh, you need to check," Mitchell insisted. "I'm sure I saw it while we were sitting there. And there's five hundred bucks in the front compartment. I'll send it right up to you, Fed Ex. You'll have it tomorrow."
I was also reminded of the tales told by friends who live in a wild jungle in the Philippines. They speak of the native children running barefoot in the jungle with machetes, and alongside deep rivers. The parents do not fear for their safety. And they are safe. How different our society is!
This morning I found a baby artichoke in the middle of the plant. It is really about the size of a 50 cent piece.
And that the instruction manual is unfathomably translated from mandarin.
16After these things I will come back, and will put up the tent of David which has been broken down, building up again its broken parts and making it complete:
DragonForce have always been exceptionally good at two things: hyper-melodic, almost cheerful power metal hooks, and guitars and drums so blisteringly fast that your fingers could start bleeding just listening to them. Power, their first release since 2008 and their debut with new singer Marc Hudson, is chock full of heroic ballads, face-melting solos and imagery so epic and fantastical that it might as well be painted on the side of a ’70s-model van. The album certainly doesn’t explore much new territory, and it’s not exactly dripping with layers of meaning and subtext, but it’s a fun bit of frenetic, escapist listening all the same.
After returning from tour the band played a few shows in the NY/NJ area but the wind was out of their sails at this point. After 4 years of turmoil, record deals gone bad and poor label support the band was getting tired and I think they felt they had done all they could do as a band so a decision was made to put an end to the Dahlia Seed story, which they did with one final soldout show at Maxwells in Hoboken NJ in August of 1996.
Please, therefore, grant me this passport, to enable me to proceed to Roumania to assist my immediate relatives there.
Corriveau was outside before the event giving the “prebuttal” and was on the pre-event conference call with New Hampshire media.
Morning! How is it for you? Have you woken up fresh and ready for the day of rest? Of course you have.
Guthrie: is it
In his analysis, Cayce also believes that every illness infiltrates itself into a body though the venomous secretions produced by the glands while they are influenced by negative emotions and feelings. The opposite would be also true according to him, because a healing of an ailment could be found through a positive attitude and the correction of vibrational fields through the practice of meditation.
And from following that theorem other habits develop. Hitting deadlines. Turning in good copy. Developing the ability to write through the tough spots. Learning that you can’t rely on inspiration. All you have is the idea, the keyboard, and the work. As the Nike folks said, Just Do It. Writing is not some Orphic experience that leads us into some transcendent state and draws energy from our spiritual side. It is simply the work. Granted, there are times when the writing does have a transformative effect on the writer. There are times when the words flow and you realize the subconscious has taken over and you ride the wave.
What has the A to Z Challenge taught you?
Therefore, it is only when we speak, act, and make decisions through His spirit of wisdom that we will succeed in pleasing Him.
We were all just talking and stroking each others’ arms and legs, when one of the other girls declared:
Had my first salad of the season from the front porch lettuce pot last night, and if you do ever plant lettuce, be sure to add some arugula. That adds a nice spice to the plate. Store-bought dressing doesn’t do much for it, but it just prods me to make some homemade vinaigrette. If it’s acceptable to you guys, I’ll create a little garden plot in the backyard while I’m there. By the time your daughter is a little one, you can show her how to go out and pick raspberries, which is really a rite of passage for kids – just like you two bumpkins did years ago. You guys saw to it that very few raspberries ever made it into the house.
I started cutting small parts of the pants vertically. Then slowly scratching some parts using cutter. After I got the effect that I want, I started using it playing with the brush putting different colors. Then lastly, I let the white paint splatter. Let it dry for whole day then to make sure that the paint will stay long, I ironed it in a medium temperature.
I also liked how the author portrayed small town living. As a girl that moved around a lot, Allie was always longing for a home. But when they finally settle down, she beings to realize that in a small town nothing can be hidden unless people don't want to see. Trip comes from a rich family and is loved by most of the town so no one wants to see him as an abuser even if it is right in front of their face. Allie is still the new girl and is far more susceptible to the town's whispers. She feels pressure not to start a new relationship--though she realizes early on that Blake is a good guy-- and to act like the normal widow. She can't move on from Trip because the town she lives in won't let her. Even if I didn't always agree with Allie's choices, the author did an awesome job making us feel the suffocation that small town living can offer.
Good questions, Scarlett! I had fun, though my answers were probably longer than you had anticipated. Thanks.
Some of the stores in the neighborhood were open and clean. Others had been abandoned. Makeshift bars crossed a lingerie shop’s broken windows, the panties in the vitrines scattered and covered with an inch of fluffy gray dust. My black coat and shoes were gray, too. The fire trucks drove the streets unwashed and covered with red names drawn in the dust with a
I may not be an educated writer, I'm a self taught writer, and every day I work on my art. I read. I read contemporary, and not so contemporary books. I'm working my way through 100 books everyone should read. I've only read 7 books on the list. When I get my SSI check which this month I'm keeping half to myself instead of giving it all to my parents as I have been doing for the past four months. I plan on buying 5 books on this 100 books everyone should read.
Entertainment Weekly has released a trailer for Tron: Uprising. I loved Tron: Legacy. I was never a diehard fan of the original Tron, but it certainly left an impact on my youthful mind. I actually think it holds up very well today. Tron: Legacy was probably the only 3D film that I felt was worth the money.
The gospel according to Monsanto is that their patented GM seeds and their bovine growth hormone (BGH) will increase worldwide production of agricultural, dairy and meat products and Bt cotton to the extent that worldwide hunger and poverty will be eradicated.
Our 9th weekly newsletter is out with very interesting news, articles, tips, deals, photos and more from the wedding World!
the LORD is about to pass by." Then a great and powerful wind tore the mountains
Paarlberg KM, Vingerhoets AJJM, Passchier J, et al. Psychosocial factors and pregnancy outcome: a review with emphasis on methodological issues. J Psychosom Res 1995; 39: 563-595.
Me: What did...
It was fall 2001, and I was speaking to tweens about my debut novel, Rain Is Not My Indian Name. The story is about Cassidy Rain Berghoff, a mixed-blood Native girl who--after the unexpected death of her best friend--slowly reconnects to her family and intertribal community through the lens of a camera.
Traditionally Green Beans Sweet Porridge with Durian (Bubur Kacang Durian) is served in gatherings for thanksgiving at home or in madrasah or mosque even though it is a common enough dessert. I have used palm sugar here because it is not as sweet as the regular sugar. You can use brown sugar or white sugar if palm sugar is not available.In that case you don't have to make the syrup. Just add the sugar to the rest of the ingredients and boil.
The extension of the set of all formal properties can only be understood in the context of Plato’s central metaphysical thesis of the Good. Plato is clear on the difference between material being and formal being. Material being is divisible (Socrates’ body can be chopped up into pieces and scattered like leaves or burnt and blown away like smoke), it is a multiplicity (I am one body, you are another), and it comes-to-be and passes away (“All men are mortal, Socrates is a man…”). What part of reality is indivisible, a unity (oneness), and eternal?
The British authorities has no legal jurisdiction and demands the Burgundians to form a committee based on the legal guidelines with the long-defunct dukedom prior to negotiating with them. Historical Burgundian law calls for which the Duke himself appoint a council. Without having 1, all appears lost – until a youthful gentleman from Dijon (Paul Dupuis) actions forward and proves that he may be the heir towards the dukedom. He duly types a governing body; 1 of its members is the shrewd shopkeeper Arthur Pemberton (Stanley Holloway) Timeless DVDs.
I filled it with black beans. I added a bunch of his little space figures (most of them are from this Space Toob), a plastic spaceship, a little bouncy ball, I cut up a silver plastic star necklace that we got for the 4th of July and added all the stars, I rolled up some aluminum foil and added a couple balls of that, a couple of silver and gold pompoms and a larger yellow ball to represent the sun. The total cost of this bin was $2 for 2 bags of beans. We had everything else on hand.
The flirting noticeable.
“The attempt to change the Macedonian encyclopedia in the interest of Albanians will degrade Macedonian historical science, which has made a tremendous progress,” he added.
Other monsters often rumoured to return? Zygons? I'd love to see the Zygons done again, and they do make a nice change (of colour). And considering their success as a monster, and that they only appeared in one original TV series, they did quite well (I can still remember them being on the back of my (sadly thrown away) Wheetabix packet). I say bring back both... but please, get someone good to write the stories!
I’m a recovering lazy-holic. I still don’t look forward to working out really. Though I will admit I’m enjoying my morning walks and my body craves them. NEVER in a million years would I have imagined that MY body would be capable of craving anything but chocolate and red wine. I’m here to witness to all you other lazy-holics that those fitness freaks are not lying, if you just hang in there your body will crave activity too. It all starts with being accountable and intentional. I made a promise to myself that I would get fit this year.
Just as Howie was finishing his task someone knocked on the locked storefront door. Howie saw James Messer standing at the glass door, and he wondered, what on earth, James could be wanting. The store had been closed for over an hour. And Howie knew that James was aware of this fact. “Yeah James, something’ wrong?” Howie asked as he unlocked the door. “My wife is having the baby, and I can’t find her mother. Mary should have been at home. Where can she be? Is there a meeting at the church tonight? Maybe she’s at her sister, Sarah’s house. I think they were supposed to pressure cook some soup beans this evening for tomorrows reunion” James replied, as he ran around like a chicken with its head cut off. “Calm down James, I’ll find her. Go back to Marlene and I’ll bring her mother to your house, as soon as I can find her.” Howie responded. James took off running toward his house, which was right down the block. Howie locked the store door and continued to secure everything before he went looking for Marlene’s mother, Mary Louise Epperson.
Now let’s look at some of the proportional other states that aren’t winner take all. Now we all know that Romney does well in New England and the North East. So Rhode Island (19), Connecticut (28) and New York (95), a total of 142 delegates, it would be safe to say that Romney will take half of those delegates (71) bringing the total to 838.
“Are you moving out or something”, she said to me.
Leather Goddesses of Phobos 2 – Gas Pump Girls Meet the Pulsating Inconvenience from Planet X!
Because why settle for just one cookie when I can have three cookies and a brownie? And…a lemon bar? Oh, and a cupcake. And a teeny, tiny slice of apple...pumpkin...and lemon meringue pie. And c'mon, it just isn't summer without Aunt Marcy's banana trifle and grandma's pumpkin roll! Heck, I can even squeeze room for that green Jell-o fluff that I don’t even like. A few more wedges of this and smidgens of that and you can bet I'll turn from the table with a teetering five-pound plate of sugar and not an ounce of self restraint.
Now, the council is of course correct that if someone fell over on Mr Farnham's repairs (given how we are so happy to sue each other these days) he does indeed face the risk of being sued. However, if they won't repair it and they won't let Mr Farnham repair it or give him the correct filing to make the repairs, what happens next?
Okay, so Snook didn't really have a formal portrait session, but I thought I'd share some more pictures of him since he's already looking less kitten-ish.
How happy was I!
Sheffield Homes, an Arms Length Management Organisation, has managed Sheffield’s council housing since the year 2004 while the Sheffield City Council playing the role of landlord. However, the agreement between Sheffield Homes and City council will end in 2014.
So, being homeschooler, you can bet I see a geography project somewhere in the near future. I’ll tell you when I come up with it. In the meantime, if you have friends or family around the world in countries not on this list, would you send them a link to this post and ask them to post a comment telling me what country they are from, how much a gallon of gas costs, and how much a gallon of milk costs? (Actually, I don’t have that information for the countries listed, and I’d love to hear from my international readers, so even if your country is on that list, please leave me a comment with that information.) Any additional information about your country of residence would be great as well, I think my kiddos (and me) would be interested in hearing any information about the nuances of the many different countries around the globe, how you spend your day, the social structure, culture, etc.
“Call for the coach’s head after the loss” guy
Brit Chadashah (New Covenant)
She would watch both the animated version and the Jim Carey version and read the book and play the nook app 3 times a day if I let her.
You've probably heard the good news! Sandy Steen Bartholomew has come out with a new Zentangle® book!
If only she would understand that the world does not revolve around her.
Article 19 No entity or individual may produce, fish or gather any prohibited edible agricultural products from or establish production base of agricultural products in any prohibited production area.
26 0z can of tomato sauce
I have made a card for this weeks LIM Challenge, something I haven’t had time to do for while (and I do miss it!). This week Chrissie and Mandi have set us a colour challenge and it’s to use predominantly yellow on our cards. Here’s mine…
two wheels and a plastic bag of sodden clothes -
Right now I'm leaning towards the following.
You’ve found a stamping home with your MFT Family, there’s fun & friendship to be had in addition to the best stamps and stamping products around.
1/4 tsp shallots
where you find
Despite tying Clegg up, gagging him and sticking him in the cupboard under the stairs for a fortnight the Lib Dems got bombed. Ironic as most parties look to emulate the kind of local campaigning the Lib Dems have always excelled at. But they've paid the price for selling out. Can't say I'm sorry. They may have been the best local campaigners over the years but they have lacked fundamental honesty at a local level, often prepared to sell their grannies for a few more votes.
Lighthouse Family life Helpline Ministry is therefore committed to effectively developing godly families that change the world one home at a time.
1 recount
The new owner will get a gas station and convenience store, a schoolhouse from 1905, a cabin, a garage, 10 acres, and a three-bedroom home at 8,000 feet altitude — overlooking the trucks and cars on the nearby interstate on one side and the distant snowcapped mountains in Rocky Mountain National Park in Colorado on the other.
"There's a woman dead," said Mr. Lawrence.
I've used Ashlee's prom and pieced her sassy prom dress. Funny, my prom dress looked almost exactly like this, just a bit more on the fuchsia side. Don't think I looked this cute though, lol! This will make a fun birthday card for a teenager on my list.
May you have love.
It’s easy to lose track of time when you’re crafting and I usually work late in the night so I don’t keep track, just go on till I’m finished. I’d say 6-7 hours but it’s probably more...
I knew that Twitter could be a force for good, but watching this expand over the course of a day was pretty extraordinary. Other authors offered giveaways and donated money. People spread the word. And at the end of the day Maureen raised enough money to fund SIX ShelterBoxes. Plus enough donations of schwag to hold another fundraising day today.
That's right, folks. True the Vote has no intentions whatsoever of upholding the integrity of the vote. The group's intention is to suppress women voters, elderly voters, college student voters, and especially, African-American voters and Latino voters.
When I refused to leave Jack simply picked me up and threw me over his shoulder. Movie style.
Lastly, remember not to view the online community as a true reflection of real life. Don’t be dragged into the Gnostic deception. And never allow the internet to replace real community with real people in your real life. One hour in genuine bible study with fellow believers is worth, to the health of your soul, a thousand hours in online groups. Because while you may learn a great many facts in such a group, you will never learn how to be a person following Christ in relation to other real people. You will be all head, and no life.
Back in February, I rather inexplicably wrote a blog about the origins of Father Christmas. In a nutshell, his jolly attire was first described in Clement Clarke Moore’s poem ‘A Visit from Saint Nicholas’ (‘’Twas the Night Before Christmas etc etc’) in 1823. In 1863, an illustrator named Thomas Nast first drew ‘Santa Claus’ (from ‘Sinterklaas’ – ‘Saint Nicholas’ in Dutch), gradually turning his coat from brown to red. By 1881, Nast had pretty much transformed the character into what we might through gritted teeth refer to as Coca-Cola Santa – bearded, jovial, a hit with the kids … a less disturbing Captain Birdseye, if you will.
Wow, I'm getting chatty lately, eh?
What is castoreum ? Apparently it is the extract of the anal glands of a beaver. It is used in perfuming and as a "natural flavoring" in quite a few items.
Devil’s Beard:
Recommended for those who’ve always wondered what it would be like if you combined a female-centered coming of age story with shounen manga style antics and Iron Chef situations; bonus for Horikita Maki and foodie fans.
They were such a hit that I thought I'd offer them to you. I know they don't apply to all, but some times those religious printables are hard to find when you're looking for them! You can now find my baptism toppers in my etsy shop personalized with the name and color of your choice. Find them here.
When I first read this, I thought Jesus had switched gears—from being fed up with them to softening a bit. Taking closer look, I saw that he said he had been acting in love the whole time! He spoke the unpleasant truth to rescue them from their wandering. Then, lest they were overwhelmed with shame, maybe even ready to run away and quit trying to be a Christian, he stepped close and said, “I’m right here at the door of your heart. Not to condemn, but because I want us to do lunch together, like we did before.”
I got my eyes with washers on the back which worked perfectly, since the washers are bigger they made these arched eyebrows that dachshunds have. The washers for the nose were almost too big, but it worked ok. I guess I could have cut them down a bit. I got my supplies from a girl at etsy called Clara which I really recommend. If you need a special listing, just ask. She made a special mix for me since I didn't know what sizes I needed. Will shop there again when my supplies run out.
*Preferably in their mother's basement.
Part nine
More photos will be posted soon!
They also have some full releases coming out and here are two of my favorites--
If all sorts of bells, whistles, and screaming authority figures are going off in your head right now, you're not alone. Like I said, schooling is a very deeply conditioned and strongly reinforced default in our society. We like to have control of outcomes, and we fear what would happen outside of the controlled (but by no means universally successful) system of education that defined our own youth. We like to have control of children's lives (after all, we're responsible for them), and we worry what they'll get into if they're not constantly scheduled and corralled into planned experiences. What do kids get up to when they aren't dictated a daily agenda? What's to keep my kids from just playing games all day long? Well, certainly not me.
This morning my devotional talking about "coming to God in faith and resisting all fear". Very fitting. That's what I'm doing--or, that's what I'm trying to do.
After I completed the update I linked my new AP cartridge and pulled out my Cricut Mini to try my hand at making a base card for my grand-daughters to decorate for their Mom for Mothers Day. You can find my inspiration here:
And do not expect them to apologise. As you may have read it before on this blog, companies Customer Services never apologies in Brazil. Oups… sorry… I reformulate… There’s no Customer Service in Brazil!
Slip N’ Slide was one of those disappointing toys, wasn’t it? The commercial was full of guitar solos and people having an absolute blast. In reality, you were lucky if you even made it all the way to the end without veering to the side, touching the grass and/or pavement, and doing a horrifyingly painful backwards somersault. I guess toys like that set us up for being disappointed by a lot of things in life in general as adults. Oh shit, remember Pogo Ball? How were those asshole kids getting so much air in those commercials? Again, guitar solos, turntable sounds, jump kicks, sideways or backwards hats and flying happy ninja children. I’ll tell you, my brothers and I barely got the thing off of the ground, let alone got three or four feet of air. Picture trying to jump with THE PLANET SATURN between your ankles and you get a bit of the idea.
I love mayonaisse ... yup ... the good ol' fashion kind ... Hellman's specifically!
I think black and white conveys the dreariness of a rainy day exceptionally well.
* Place dough in a lightly greased (use vegetable oil or butter) mixing bowl, cover with cling wrap or a damp cloth and let proof in room temperature (around 28 to 30 degC) for about one hour, or until double in bulk.
After leaving Carcassonne, we took an overnight stop at Narbonne, another favourite city of ours in the region. The Languedoc has so much to offer in history, food and wine.
CONFITEOR
favorite animal:
There is nothing to suggest they tried to come upstairs, but thank goodness I had the rape gates locked. FYI, if you don't already know, "rape gates" are big steel "panic room" style gates that partition off a portion of your house, usually bedrooms. From behind the rape gates, somewhere in the partitioned-off area, there is (usually) an escape hatch. In most places I've lived up here, the escape hath is usually deliberately out-of-sight of the rape gate.. for self-evident reasons.
August 2002 my mechanic Tony announced he was taking holidays from Aug. 15th until Sept. 3rd. He didn’t ask, he just announced and I was in no position as his employer to really tell him no or he could just simply quit and then I’d really be in troubles – and he knew this. I hated being at the mercy of someone for my livelihood. I’d had this when Rob was alive too and became very conscious of that fact the last month of Rob’s life when he more or less abandoned work and left me on my own. Now I was in no better a position 18 months later with my mechanic Tony, and I just hated that!
I'm down to 84 Facebook friends. At one time, I had almost 600. I deleted people in huge waves because I didn't even know half of them. Their status updates bombarded my timeline, making it difficult to stay caught up with the friends I actually knew personally. I also found myself deleting people I argued with, former students, and Christians whose overly simplistic worldview annoyed me. In other words, I wanted a collection of friends who were actually my friends. For now, that number is 84. I no longer add people outside of my inner circle of trusted friends. That sounds harsh, but it felt healthier to limit the people I share my life with to people I actually want to share my life with. It makes sense to me, but I know it sounds offensive to others.
I know it’s important to provide Heavenly Father’s children with healthy bodies and safe homes, but that must be only the beginning of being a mother.
He improved, but then he got the diarrhea back. I couldn’t get him to clear up. I had him confined to a small area so he wasn’t using lots of energy, and I was feeding him more food than any one goat should have ever been able to consume. I would cut grass out of the ditches every day so he always had fresh green food. He got hay. He had grain. This goat ate more food than I would have thought possible, and it just went straight through him.
You know, this tastes a great deal like a bock, and not just because it has a hint of the Shiner Bock taste to it, but it has a solid malt that fades pretty quickly to a crisp bitterness that never overpowers it or makes you forget that it's mostly malt. Nice and mild with kind of a peppery finish, it goes very well with my BBQ.
“These rules ensure that programmes are free, and are seen to be free, from commercial or other outside pressures,” read the statement.
Fact; People really call me Tyler and Alex. xD
Come on over for a tasting!
Naked In Death by J.D. Robb – Sadly some of my suggestions are starting to repeat, but this I felt was a strong similar feel to 1st to Die. Strong policewoman in homicide, serial killers on the loose, nice twists and turns. I think the two books are a very similar match! Very similar feel and another series I started and couldn’t put down.
Finally, I heard a beautiful spiritual interpretation of this event.
An okapi is one of the few animals in the world to have an onomatopoeic name – the word “okapi” is a representation of the noise mature males make while eating:
It’s time for a makeover!
It's super casual sporty kinda Mexican bar in our neighborhood that has two huge projector tv screeny things and a lot of tequila. (its a bit 'hollywood' for our neighborhood, but when in rome)
Publisher: Natur och Kultur
“Thanks for coming, GB,” said George. “I’d like you to meet Inspector Pierre Cocteau, an off-duty detective from Marseille.”
After a quick investigation, the police agents determined the relationship of one of the workers of the company, who had been working in harvesting and storing for 12 years, with the above-mentioned facts.
I, as a gamer, don’t like spoilers on new worlds, I’d like to know a few base details on the new update but NO SPOILERS! Only because, it’s much more tense and gives you a unique experience when you play the game yourself and you feel so excited, which I do with Zafaria and the way this world has been built was magnificent and I am having a great time there!
- Another name for Jodhpur is the “Sun City” - bright and sunny weather all year, so appropriately named
don’t have to be nice.
and a stylus to add color. Note: you could use a sponge also. After laying down my first layer of color, I masked the clock face. I was planning to add a lot of color and wanted to keep the clock face light. I could say I laid the color down first then masked so that the face would not be a stark white. The truth is I forgot to mask before I did my first layer. :o)
Being the rationalist that I am, I don’t really believe in luck. I feel it is nothing more than a subjective interpretation of events in contextual relationship with other events that might be construed as being either “better” or “worse”. If you’re in a bad car smash, you are unlucky. But if you only break your leg you are lucky. If the ambulance crew saws your hand off trying to get you out of the car, then you’re unlucky again. If the hand was subsequently found to have life threatening gangrene that would have killed you within hours had it not been sawn off, you’re back to lucky. If the car was your pride and joy, then you’ll feel unlucky to have lost it. If it was a
Everyone knows parsley – it’s the brighten-things-up, light + leafy go-to herb. But did you know that there’s something delicious lurking underneath that bushy bunch of greens? It’s the root, and by golly you can eat that part too.
I started my project by making labels for the binders using Microsoft Excel (I know they are already color coded but labels are just so fun!). I measured the width of my binders and created the labels to fit into the end sleeves and printed them on cardstock for increased durability.
Original flavour only
yard for $12. So hopefully I will be making a pillow in the next few days on top of a few other little projects I have started, which include making a new wreath for my front door and a geneology chart.
Planet of Lost Souls
Contest has ended.
Embossing Folder - Provocraft Swiss Dots
Our beach is not a very big one and constantly subject to erosion. I have the feeling that our property owner's association fee for using the beach in the summer (quite steep--but I find it hard not to cave in and scrape up the dough when the beach in question is 100 yards from my front door) entails adding sand to the beach in time for summer beach-going.
09 - Respect Me In The Morning 03:23
with Brian Eno. Both are fascinated by what Eno regards as the most
Be aware of your surroundings. I can’t stress this enough. Take precautions before you become a crime statistic; not afterwards. Criminals do not share your moral values, they are not your friends or your neighbors and will see you only as an obstacle to getting what they want. If you get that feeling that something is wrong pay attention to it as your gut reactions are usually correct.
Jill: *Sputter* What?!
“Her memories of the Christians who populated her youth were not fond ones,” Obama wrote. “For my mother, organized religion too often dressed up closed-mindedness in the garb of piety, cruelty and oppression in the cloak of righteousness.”
"We would like to talk to the youngest male adult in the household.
Heft is so full of hope and redemption that one's heart just soars during the reading. All things seem possible even in the midst of such sadness and despair. This book is unique and perfection for those who say they prefer to care about the characters in their books. Believe me, I read hundreds, probably thousands of reviews a month, often groaning at the plethora of same old, same old plots. The depth of compassion, warmth, humor, and truth in Heft renews my faith in the future of literature.
Ananias believed God for in verse 17, He “went his way.” Now, if Ananias believed God, should these Jews who were standing before Paul? This is why the Apostle is using him as a character witness, a reference.
And what a celebration it is ...it's their 200th sketch challenge..whowzers...head over to the blog and check it out...they have graciously given a file with every sketch in it to anyone who wants it absolutely free!...
(That’s what I am about to become…… a married bug zapper extraordinaire)
Now, without the unnecessary baggage:
But the roll of honour doesn’t end there.
I will have a tutorial on how to make this ornament on the Frosted Designs blog on Sunday- December 18th- so be sure to come back and check it out. (just click on the name)
He nodded in agreement and said, “Yes it is. Now use the coffee cup along with the tree and the word kindness in your speech” And just like that, poof, he was gone. His work was done. He left his imprint on me once again. He left me standing with my mouth wide open wondering what just happened. He left me alone to carry on the message he helped me to get from my newest friend the old oak tree.
“Ryan was hurting, saying he was going to end it all, stuff like that,” recalls his best friend, Steve Schaeffer, who served with him in Iraq and says he has likewise struggled with the V.A. to get mental health services. “Getting an appointment is like pulling teeth,” he said. “You get an appointment in six weeks when you need it today.”
"Good. No tears yet. Time enough for those later. Now," he instructed as he gently lifted me to the soft carpet, "you will sit right there for a moment while I arrange a few things."
Honest to fuck, that's what she asked me.
I think that is missing in most young mothers. We sort of come up with this idea of martyrdom when we take on the role of mother. It's not good if we have too much fun, or think of ourselves first, or ever think that something else is more important than our children. We don't want to be judged by others for "not-doing-everything-humanly-possible-for-our-children-like-making-sure-their-sandwich-crusts-are-cut-off." Most psychologist and marriage counselors will tell you that mothers should absolutely NOT do that, where they put their children as the most important aspect of their relationship, but we still do it. Often. Other child specialists tell us that we HAVE to let our children fail on their own, that we shouldn't protect them from life, and that our children need to learn lessons, the hard ones on their own. However, our worlds have become child-centered and positively driven and run by the needs of the littlest ones in the family. I can't even sit down for 1 minute straight at any given meal because I will be getting up and down multiple times for multiple things while I try to shovel food into my mouth and take care of my family.
A critical measurement used in the formula to assess sidewalk capacity was regularly used incorrectly in the FEIS, according to AYW. As a result, the capacity of more than 86 percent of the sidewalks in the 2006 Final Environmental Impact Statement (FEIS) are overstated.
Fragrant lust waits beside
Gorgeous gorgeousness! It was lovely to be there and to dance with three of my favourite partners. The breeze caresses your face as the sun goes down and the ancient wooden floor catches your heels as you spin round the bandstand. It was always one of my favourite places to dance tango. I have very happy memories of my first times there as well as some more uncomfortable ones of times when I stood at the edge feeling lonely and awkward.
I usually don't get the flu. In fact I can't really remember the last time I got it. Why? Every year I get my flu shot like a good girl and escape the season unscathed. But somehow this year I forgot to get my flu shot. Worse than that, I forgot to get my kids flu shots! And I forgot to harass my husband to get his flu shot!! There we were, 4 souls in a sea of germs completely unprotected. Walking around with big targets on our back. It was just a matter of time.
I don't like Kiwi's joke. Would he make a similar joke about other oppressed children in daguerreotypes?
We found out the resort was serving a full breakfast buffet so we went up and had probably the best breakfast you could have for 10 bucks. By now people began filling the resort preparing for doom. We grabbed our paperwork and turned in the death waivers and prepared for the beginning of the end, so to speak, haha. It was only a matter of hours before our 12:40 start time so we were starting to get beyond what you might call, “anxious”. We used the analogy… “It feels like we’re about to go into battle, or jump out of a plane into Nazi Germany”.
The appropriate reactions are (and enthalpies for the curious or insane):
Freelancers? Feh, they can wait.
Girls, you know you get those guys who are really easy to get on with, make you laugh, and you know you can trust, and that you will be friends with but nothing more – well that’s me right now.
jpelaia@sha.state.md.us or 410.787.7620
5. Tag 12 people and let them know by visiting their blogs and leaving a comment for them.
This unparalleled level of detail helps connect people to the Bible in the original languages in a way never before possible without years of study of Hebrew, Aramaic, and Greek. It unlocks the riches of the Bible’s truth from entirely new perspectives.
15nos Jackfruit seeds
You heard it here first, ladies and gentlemen!
"Nope," he answered again.
It's more than that, though. That's a personal reason, and other people have different personalities. But at a much deeper level, I think of myself as a storyteller. And storytelling emerged thousands of years before writing, and thousands more before anything like what we think of as books. To me, for a writer to cut themselves off from oral strorytelling, from the whites of their audience's eyes, is to cut themselves off from the whole of that history. It's like cutting off a limb.
Now, come here and give Gramma a kiss and a hug.
What tasks do you put off?
clearly when he presented the following series of complaints through the ages:
Madison Avenue in the sunshine, I'm walking alone in a Burberry trench and sunglasses, feeling like a fortune. Lunch in solitude at Bloomingdales after browsing through sheer spring dresses and purple leather gloves to the clicking sound of heels on marble. The skies aren't just clear, they're limitless, nothing like that airtight glass ceiling that kept pushing me to the ground in LA and everywhere else.
Jack came to stay this weekend and this is what I wore to wander into town with him on Sunday for a bit of shopping and a drink at Pitcher and Piano. It was such a gorgeous day, it felt so great to crack the Ray Bans out of their hibernation! I also thought I'd wear my floral playsuit to match the spring-like weather (which is now making me think of Meryl Streep in The Devil Wears Prada saying, "Florals? For Spring? How original.") I normally wear it to go out at night, but I think it's really cute for a sunny day, and is so easy to throw on without having to think about it.
"President Obama has betrayed the Bible and the Black Church with his endorsement of same-sex marriage. The Bible is crystal clear on this subject, and the Black Church strongly opposes same-sex marriage. His endorsement is an inadvertent attack on the Christian Faith. America is now a candidate for the same judgment received by Sodom and Gomorrah. This was a sad, sad day and a very bad decision, by our beloved President. The moral impact of this day and decision is equal to the military impact of AL-Queda when they attacked the Twin Towers on 911. Today’s announcement is a moral earthquake equivalent to a tsunami or hurricane that will have far more devastating results than Katrina." Rest Here!
“If I speak in the tongues of mortals and of angels, but do not have love, I am a noisy gong or a clanging cymbal. And if I have prophetic powers, and understand all mysteries and all knowledge, and if I have all faith, so as to remove mountains, but do not have love, I am nothing. If I give away all my possessions, and if I hand over my body so that I may boast, but do not have love, I gain nothing.” (1 Cor. 13.1-3)
Casting herself as the real victim in the affair, Roberts bizarrely contended that criticism of her work came from “Duke-player supporters who felt threatened when someone, whether it was me or another columnist, started poking at the culture of affluence and entitlement.”
Overall: Pretty good alt compared to the other domestic varieties I have had. Very crisp, good hoppy bitterness, and a good amount of yeast fruity esters.
Well done folks! Grab your top 3 badge from the sidebar for your blogs!
So, on the chance HV do offer me a contract, what does an author do who has already been rejected by agents all over town do?
Now, before even watching the film, I had a hard time fathoming what could possibly be seen as a good point. Couldn't think of a single thing, but I was in for a little surprise that can be summed up in three words; Christopher Flipping Walken. As I stated earlier, I usually study information about the film before I watch and that goes double for cast members. I'm pretty much a sucker for him and he always seems to make me smile whenever he just comes up on screen. He was barely in it for five minutes, as a detective who comes to see if Gigli was doing anything suspicious, it made me laugh. Not for his dialog, but for wondering how he was in this awful film in the first place. Did he somehow end up on the wrong set and just go with it? Was he somehow bribed into it? The world may never know.
The Centurion brand, "Equipe"story started here with having received a scan of the 1985 BICYCLE GUIDE which had a feature behind the creation of this bicycle.
I like vampires, I like the novel that this movie is based on and I also happen to like Timur Bekmambetov. To me this has a chance to make my jaw drop with the crazy visuals and kick ass story. Of course adaptations can be a treacherous business, but I choose to be positive about it.
God is not only good, His ways are not our ways, His thoughts are not our thoughtS. He is very, very big and has very, very many facets.
Mass Effect 3 is really a good game. I can’t flame the game as a whole when the developers got most of the game right, but severely failed when it came to the 1% which is the ending. I can still replay this game again and ignore the fact that the ending is terrible. I’d rather relive my connection to the characters and story. It is also nice to see characters spread out throughout the Normandy ship and at times talking to other squad members. It shows that they aren’t just stuck to the same place you expect them to be, but are in fact walking around and interacting with other people. Even better when you see characters leave the ship and hang out around the Citadel while you do the Citadel side missions or buy items. Interacting with them in the Citadel adds to the realism of the characters and the Mass Effect universe. These are the huge positives of the game.
And as for those children's-book buying middle classes: do Simon Juden etc really think that aunties going into the bookshop to buy presents for Christmas and birthdays constitute the main bulk of the children's book market? And not those kids let loose in the children's departments on Saturday afternoons seeing and grabbing and ignoring or influencing the adult choices (and dropping like hot bricks anything labelled with an age range other than the ones they'd like to be identified with, which might well not include their own)?
Have a great week y'all!
Well, now it's your turn. We'd love to see how you make a circle card....
Epicenter: 99.87°E 0.80°S
For a moment, I wonder if I look like that.
I wont wear them in the rain when I just got them 2 weeks ago
But unable to crack the big leagues of automobile and packaged goods accounts, DDB was left with second-tier clients like Ohrbach’s department store and Levy’s Jewish Rye bread. The fresh, playful ads that resulted were both a rejection of Madison Avenue conformity and the client toadyism that went hand-in-hand with it, and brought this upstart young agency to the attention of Volkswagen.
I picked this record up just a few months back in a thrift store. I have a couple Tito Puente records already in the collection so I was already pretty sure I wouldn't be disappointed. Other than a little dust, which I did my best to clean off, the record was in pretty good condition. I think it was the first record I threw on the turn table the afternoon I purchased it along with some other records. Right off the bat, from the first horn blasts I knew I had found a gem.
Somewhere down the line during my matriculation at the prestigious and oh so fashion forward Howard University, where I watched girls teeter on 4-inch heels, with Louis Vuttion bags sitting in the crooks of their elbows, faces made up to perfection for 8 a.m. classes, their influence– no matter how vain I thought they were– was seeping into my psyche.
Be sure to check out MysteryPeople’s upcoming events this month:
"It's called pride, not discrimination!" - Kay:)
To enter, post your name below.
An Ipad,
Her ‘office’ became the clean kitchen table, able to be used only after every crumb and greasy Vegemite smear had been wiped away for the tenth and final time that day. She would work to the soundtrack of the washing machine humming and sloshing and ticking over, the sound of wet buttons on steel; the 60 minute cycle a vague excuse to have time to herself. When all the vagaries of domestic life had been neatened and folded, put back in their place, children sleeping, the dog fed and in the yard, she let her mind run as fast and as hard in whatever direction it could.
Our bodies were made to stretch in ways your mama never told you - all to grow a love that gives us a glimpse of how He loves us.
I know I could donate magazines and get all goodie-two-shoes about it. But that attitude is what created the pile in the first place. I needed to devote to done. Recycling was as goodie-two-shoes as I was going to get.
I looked up the word staff in the dictionary and one of the meanings is “a symbol of authority” (Merriam Webster). The staff is a symbol of the authority of Jesus Christ, the Good Shepherd, who God the Father has seated “at his right hand in the heavenly realms, far above all rule and authority, power and dominion, and every title that can be given, not only in the present age but also in the one to come,” Ephesians 1:20-21. Jesus has ALL rule, authority, power and dominion. He has every title now and forever. He is the Eternal King of the Everlasting Kingdom. There is no one above Him! This is who is in me and in all believers. As I come under His authority and live surrendered fully to His will, I become His ambassador. I have that authority because He lives in me! This is important stuff! The enemy doesn’t want us to know and remember this because when we do, he is doomed.
I’ll keep you guys updated on the trial. As long as I can get into contact with O. J. Simpson’s lawyer, I should have a case.
Purchased from my local Salvos last year
Warm water.
When I pointed out to her that the MMR vaccine she was promoting had aborted human baby in it.
I am sincerely rejoiced however that I ever was born,
First, blue, blue water, bluer than at El Banco or Corbeteña has moved into the Bay of Banderas. We have seen Yellowfin Tuna for the last few weeks that are very large in front of Yelapa but you´d be hard pressed to get them to take a bait. Then BAM, Dorado move into the area, that´s right amigos they are in the bay, at the points of Punta Mita, Just before you hit Cabo Corrientes. The Marietta Islands have added Dorado to the list as well. The surprise here is the simple fact that the water is much colder than they like, but there is bait in the bay and while the water is cool, not cold, Dorado can be boated off Los Arcos! I mean I have never seen this before in mid January to have Dorado on our door step.
Today, I will bear witness to this special miracle of the life of Howard Patrick. Through the faith, the courage, and the strength of his new family, I was humbled, awed and filled with hope.
When coming up with names, think Greek mythology, mixed with extreme adventure, nautical stuff, and funky smells. You have your assignment, now GO!
Samurai Cathy found this passage interesting…
Tzatziki Dressing:
All that remains
a suicide engagement; to be carried out
Are you freaking out about 50? Or how did you feel when that meter flipped? Did you make any resolutions that stuck?
- 1/2 tbsp salt
The first event raised several thousand pounds from the sale of ribbon pins. Profits were split between the following five national organisations, in recognition of the tireless support that they give to bereaved parents and their families: ARC (Antenatal Results and Choices), the Babyloss fund, Ectopic Pregnancy Trust, Miscarriage Association and SANDS (Stillbirth and Neonatal Death Society).
Sauerkraut:
One theory holds that the name ”Nazareth” is derived from the Hebrew noun ne·ṣer, נֵ֫צֶר, meaning branch. (“Nazareth”, The Catholic Encyclopedia, 1911)
Hugest of thanks to everybody who joined in last week – your card certainly were to die for :) And hugest of thanks to the sweetness that is our Lols for holding the fort while I was away sunning myself in Anglesey (I am joking about the sunning bit – where did it go???)
I know it will be a good Christmas, even without the 590. Because I got a beautiful wife and great kids (who can't make it here this year but that's what phones are for)...and, of course, Imopup and her minion, Skully (her brother) who are busy taking over the world as we speak.
It’s just your point of view
We talked about how much I hate talking about that.
Thanks for looking and all the great comments!
As we've noted before, rue as an herb doesn't play much of a role in most cooking these days due to its sharp, fairly unpleasant scent and flavor (Ruta graveolens literally means "Bitter herb with a strong, unpleasant smell"), but we love having it in the butterfly garden, where both Black Swallowtails and Giant Swallowtails use it as a host plant. Interestingly, this herb is apparently quite admired in its native Southeastern Europe, where it's the national flower of Lithuania and is frequently carried in bridal bouquets. To each their own, I guess.
Yes they put the word Patriot on it and every congressman with a pen (save one I know) scribbled their little Benedict Arnold on it like the little scum sucking French whores that they are. So at the end of it all what’d we get? We got bigger government, bigger wars, bigger erosion of civil liberties, bigger world policing. We got the habit of looking in our closets’, under our beds, in our medicine cabinets, at the library, at the grocery store, in the cab, out of the cab, back in the cab because you got to get home and then all throughout the house to make sure there wasn’t a terrorist in there. Because in case you haven’t heard they hate us because we are free. We are free to give up our freedom to be protected from those who hate us because we are free. Now I don’t think, had ye not the history books and the magic of Google you would believe me if I told you that at the end of that mystical, magical presidency…the one who doesn’t need to focus on fish and people coexisting as much as people and people coexisting…got reselect…reelected.
However, I didn’t have time to do it and decided to make it up as I went along. This is the first time I have done this with a festival, and I decided to do it to see how it would go. The ritual went well, but I had the feeling that if I had planned it beforehand it would have been better.
A couple of weeks before we got married, Hubby was on a pre-planned mission trip in the Darien Jungle in Panama. When he got back to the States, he didn't feel so great. Three days before our wedding, he was slammed with a headache and a fever of 104 and I think some other things. My mom told me to take him to the ER. I did. And the ER was apparently busy or something (even though they didn't look it), and they left Hubby lying on the floor (because he hurt too much to stand up) for about three hours until they got him back into a room.
I settled on one-size covers pretty early on because of the need for diapers that would fit more than one child. And being able to wipe them clean to re-use is great! I'm a big fan of hemp because it is incredibly absorbent, naturally anti-microbial and yet still soft (especially hemp fleece and hemp jersey). It's thanks to hemp that my little ones can go 12 hours at night without a
In every good story, there had to be a villain and because Knox was good looking and sexy, she was immediately cast as the villainous femme fatale and Kercher who looked wholesome and sweet, the innocent “virgin to the slaughter”.
What did you think of those songs, the way they were performed then?
So last year I recapped these awards and ended up getting all kinds of blog hits, so I thought I'd give it a go again. In preparation I re-read last year's blog. Again, I know next to nothing about country music, and don't particularly enjoy them, so expect lots of mockery ahead.
cloud blue,camel,apricot,aster,soft peach (middle row L-R)
We discovered that Harmondsworth village is particularly rich in ancient buildings. The local medieval church of St Mary’s is lovely. One can easily imagine their harvest festivals for centuries on end featuring produce from the massive barn next door.
Now, this looks all very neat and tidy but the mission of getting it into the door was quite something. Did I mention that the back door is two sheets of metal with polystyrene in between?!?!? Quite something. I think Jayne and Ana were privy to the sound of it being put in during one of our Skype sessions – not pretty. But, lo, there it is. The door has a variety of settings but for Roach’s purposes it is set such: anyone from inside can open it outwards, so it’s “unlocked” when going from inside the house to outside. Then, in the top panel are the batteries, which when put in, allow you to set the flap to “Learn Mode”. Herein lies the rub: you then have to get the cat to go through it while in Learn Mode so that it can programme itself to your cat’s chip. Think about this for a moment. Cat has never been outside. Cat is still a little nervy at the total change of scenery. Cat is warm inside. Cat can tell it’s freezing outside. And given the traumatic journey here, allowing someone to shove him through a hole of any size, no matter what promise of adventure it might hold, is not an option.
1 learn
Tip #4: Make sure everyone understands the plan What is the plan to communicate and enroll employees? This often-overlooked step is extremely important to the long term success of the plan. In a 2009 article on how to develop an effective benefits communication strategy, the Society for Human Resource Management (SHRM) recommends a comprehensive benefits communication plan that considers the demographics and life stages of the participants as well as the company and employee culture.
Enough from me, more pictures.^_^
Whispers colouring pens pinks and purples and Aquamarkers Bamboo
Anyway, enjoy the pics (templates from ePassportPhoto.com)!
For when you look into my soul
So, are they worth it? Well, that depends. Flavour-wise, I was really impressed. The Roog, at €4.99 for 330ml was the first Rauchweizen I tried that I felt really worked, and it exceeded expectations. Similarly, I’m a big fan of the American interpretation of IPAs, and the Indra checked all of the boxes, and then some. Simply brilliant. But at €5.99 for 330ml, I simply cannot justify that as a regular purchase, especially as it is most likely made locally. Sadly, that means that while at best, they may expect an occasional purchase for curiosity, they won’t be getting regular custom from me (sad for me too!). I can’t help wondering if this kind of pricing is shooting themselves in the foot, but then there will always be someone with more money than sense.
One outcome of relentless indoctrination in the upbeat is that positive thinking has become a core value of society, and woe to anyone who refuses to grin widely and feel good:
Social media is often referred to as the key component of “web 2.0.” Web 1.0 was relatively static. In the early years of the Internet, information flowed only one way—from the publisher to the public. Websites didn’t change from day to day and online communication was mostly limited to email.
What I think happened is that in American culture, hats weigh in as counter-culture (we are not a hat-wearing nation) and counter-culture is equated with creatives. Because of my love for art/photography/design, I am considered a creative. So hats fit me. (I also look good in them!)
Jack E, Shelbyville, MI:
“No, I’m not here for that, or anything else. I just wanted to ask you some questions.”
I do live. I have five kids and much going on throughout the days. And yet, I hold a torch for my birthfamily. I always will. They have hurt me deeply as apparently my reappearance has caused them much ache; and yet, if they asked for me, I would come running.
men in her life, her husband Jerry and her son Steve.
we asked Germans develop a framework in line with our national such as the Council in order to take advantage of international experience to help us to find a structure that is flexible and is serious in taking the decision away from the bureaucracy.
Incumbent Ed Lee was elected as San Francisco’s mayor following Tuesday’s ballot, in the first truly competitive race for the office using ranked-choice voting, according to unofficial results announced late Wednesday. (more)
The other illustration goes to my back deck and the passage in Psalm 104 quoted above. God makes the green things grow because the cows need to eat and man needs food, ointment, and drink for his whole health, body, mind, and spirit. We consider the growth of food as "natural" or worse, a "right" to which man is privy, due to the "natural" law of hunger. Yet God is the originator of such growth and as a consequence, He is the originator of well-fed cows and healthy people. (God also gives enjoyment of food and drink, which itself is a grace. Woe to the man who eats and drinks yet is not satisfied - see Ecclesiastes 6) The clear import is that food and drink, when in short supply, may or may not be caused by faulty human activity, but certainly comes directly from God, whether through secondary agencies or not, meaning He is also the originator of sick cows and unhealthy people.
Down the years, Jesus has worked in various styles and for many very different publications, such as women's magazines, childrens' books and, in comics, on science fiction, heroic fantasy, adventure, thrillers and superhero strips.
The steering wheel has gained sound commands on the steering wheel versions TOP SRV and SRV. Toy ota SW4 features beige with dark gray panel and with the addition of standard wooden steering wheel and doors.
- A snapshot of the global therapeutic scenario for Spinal Muscular Atrophy (SMA) .
“You gave me hyacinths first a year ago;
Even though I have studied, written about and linked to pANini s’ikSa, people don’t spend time on it – it requires work and thought and openness. The answers as to what is right and whatvis wrong can be had there.
On the lips I'm wearing NYX Purple Rain Lipliner and OCC Liptar in Katricia. The cheeks are Illamasqua Cream Pigment in Depravity and I used Prorance Sunny Glam Water Glow Skinfinish in M13 to highlight. I always have a bit of trouble blending bright purples right to the edge of the lipliner, and I'm not really digging the eyes with the lips, but I love Katricia.
What makes this even more amazing is that the OT says that there is no person who can perform works in the same way that Yahweh does:
Do you have any ideas for it?
Think that’s good? It only gets better. There’s cross-dressing maidens, nefarious wreckers, drunken parsons, loose women and chaste maidens. It ends, as all things should, with multiple marriages and a finale for the ages. Any troupes out there interested in staging this shipwreck classic?
The pitcher looked around, saw us in our uncomfortable, crouching, ready position and pitched her first pitch. Ball! For the non softball lovers, that is a bad pitch. She got ready and pitched her second. And the batter let it rip. At the resounding crack of the ball hitting the bat, I moved mainly out of instinct. There was a loud roar from the spectators. I was frantically looking around me running hither and thither looking for the ball, till my team mates ran towards me with joyful faces. What the heck? Why were they zeroing in on me instead of fielding the ball, the batter must be running all four bases now and scoring. The women started thumping my back congratulating me while I screamed, ‘What is going on??? Where is the ball!!!’ A few seconds of silence, before the captain lifted my gloved hand, and showed me the softball safely nestled in my glove! I had caught the ball and got the batter out, and I had no clue! I looked up to see the batter walking back to the dugout. Instead of feeling the joy, I felt like an idiot!
The songwriter Randy Newman once composed a song called "Naked Man." The song was inspired by a true criminal case.
Several senior Newscorp executives and company lawyers descended ‘like vultures’ on James Weatherup’s desk within minutes of being told of the celebrity news editor’s arrest, it was alleged yesterday. It is clear from initial reactions inside Wapping that the management were caught completely off guard by the arrest; but on hearing that Weatherup had been held, the scavengers put all the desk’s contents into several bags.
All I could think about when I went back to sleep was I wonder if my readings are going to change again.
White bubble start forming almost immediately once you spread it out over your face. Here comes the fun part where you leave it alone and let it bubble. The next couple of photos will show you the chronological order of the bubbling.
Finally got some sunlight; the past few days have been almost constant rain, until we are having some flooding in some areas of Utah. When the ground dries a bit over the next few days, I hope to get the garden ready. There are lots of perennial herbs that I have been able to use, and some of the greens, but it has been a bit chilly for stuff like tomatoes, peppers, and squash.
Most people re-watch the films they like, often on several occasions. For many people, including myself, the first two Terminator films are probably among the most frequently watched films of all time. And like a book that only gets better with each subsequent reading, viewers are bound to notice things they didn’t pick up on before. Sometimes these can even be parallels from film to film. Combine several viewings with one’s OCD tendencies and even the most arbitrary things will match up. And because these are films that we’ll probably never get sick of talking about, here are some parallels I’ve noticed between James Cameron’s sci-fi companions, The Terminator and Terminator 2: Judgment Day.
26. If cow-man pass wild meat whah mek me must pick up am. You should not go against the decision or choice of a person you feel is qualified to make the right choice.
When I think of San Francisco, I don’t think of my neighborhood or my jobs or the incredible parking places I’ve stumbled upon. I think of my grandfather marrying my grandmother at St. Vincent de Paul Church, my father’s stories of police cruisers lining the block during dinner parties. I think of shopping for groceries at the Marina Safeway and my gramps knowing all of the checkers’ stories.
To change your HTML, you need to firstly go to your 'Design' tab and click 'Edit HTML'.
Mostly, this paragraph kicks me in the goddamn gut because I didn’t write it. Wow. I knew Baldwin was good, but so far Another Country is a revelation.
The Yellows of Citrine and Beryl
Brent got the Sympathizer card, so he had to reveal it. Since our Morale was in the red (we did that on purpose because a feature of the Sympathizer card is that if none of our resources are in the red, then whoever gets the Sympathizer card becomes a revealed cylon. Which would be a problem, as then we would have three cylons), he was sent to the brig as just that — a human Sympathizer (if you believe what I said about him being human).
He’s put new sticks into the first two houses. He’s like his own realtor; I can picture him inside, fluffing pillows and spraying Homemade Cookie Scent all over.
The birds fly in lazy circles
So enjoy her Jimi Hendrix inspired look and please don't forget to vote for her!
It was really simple, but the girls loved it! I'm sure you would have to add a more complicated element for older kids, but it was a blast for 3 and 5 year olds and their adult guests!
and no matter how far, to be so happy again.
Step 5: Enjoy
ready for roasting
As we see, the devil and his angels have been made men incarnate who are cast into the lake of fire that has been prepared for them. (Those who are new to my ministry, I wold advise you to read my articles reference the devil and his angels being made men incarnate. All those who are on the left of Jesus on Judgment Day are the devil and his angels made men. There is not one man on the number who are on the left of Jesus on Judgment Day who were “mere mortal men” who were made men and haplessly ended up on the left of Jesus on Judgment Day as men who go to hell. Rather, all those on the left of Jesus on Judgment Day are in fact the devil and his angels who in the course of human history have been conceived and have died as men as incarnate devils. These incarnate devils comprise the whole of the reprobate throughout all human history. Only the devil and his angels are on the left of Jesus on Judgment Day in human flesh appearing. There is no “human population” who are NOT the devil and his angels incarnate on the left of Jesus on Judgment Day.)
29th February (Munich
Wars of Globalisation, Wars against Women
Paw took the shot close to Bounddary Bay and the eagle is sitting in a top of a phone pole.
- Brooklyn Democratic boss Vito Lopez garnered more than 88 percent of the vote and was reelected to his Bushwick Assembly seat Tuesday -- even though he's under federal investigation. Daily News
It has gone a week since Odie was taken from me and it still feels like he will enter the door anyday now. There is a problem though, I picked up his urn at the hospital yesterday. He wont enter the door again, because he is made into ashes that stands next to my bed at the moment. In some way it feels like I should think of a good way to honour his memory, but he had such a personality that it makes it so hard to figure out how. I could bury him in the garden, but it feels like that I leave him here when I wont come home and live here anymore. I could spread him in the ocean, then I could visit him wherever I am in the world and he loved to swim in the ocean. Everytime he was allowed to swim around, I took of my shoes and walked out with him and he circulated close to my legs lik I almost could feel his body touch me. I loved to do that, which is something I wont be able to do again. I can’t carry his urn wherever I go, but in same way I want to do that as it feels like he is close to me all the time.
But my favourite dress was Penelope Cruz's grey/blue off the shoulder dress.
The Boers lost their independence in 1902 at the conclusion of the Anglo-Boer War what they lost in 1994 was what little say they thought they still had in the old dispensation.
Then intersects this experience: we were in Waynesville, NC visiting with our friends at Camp Bethel. What our friends do is serve the poor and underprivileged, and rescue children/foster children and rescue animals ... they are - in short - awesome, and truly trying to live out their walk with Jesus. They have many acres in a cove in the mountains around Waynesville where they all live communally but aim to live lives of service and sacrifice. "Church" is held at this soup kitchen in Frog Level called "Open Door" on Sunday mornings ... the place looks like any old-town store-front restaurant space without all the embellishments, the rickety hardwood floors magnifying the sound.of each of the homeless folks trying to slip in slowly and sit down to just wait. The ones that arrive early are there for the service, which is directed by our friends Kalon and Richard. I helped lead worship this particular week, but most of the time Kalon does. Most of the folks don't really interact with one another. They just sit around tables. And wait. Haggard, some wasted, all tired. All poor. Some young, most old. All there to be comforted in both body and spirit. This particular week the meal being served was to be chicken, so the place was unusually packed, according to a certain fellow I met named William, whose facial expression did not change throughout the morning... he looked concerned, without change regardless of whether what was going on around him was good, bad or ugly. I tried talking to him, but he just stared at me with concern. The only things he said were about the fact that the place was more packed than usual, and that Shiloh's seat next to him was encroaching on his personal space. He ate, and like the others, left when they were finished with their meals.
Whether it was Amy getting drunk with Pete Doherty (gee, there’s news), passing out in an alley, making up racist nursery rhymes, or losing touch with both her work and audience in her meltdown in Belgrade, we saw it all. And, like peeping toms, we continued to watch but could do nothing to stop it. It was if we were wondering which of her best songs, on both her debut CD Frank (2003) and Back to Black, might fulfill themselves in her final flame out. In fact, you could swear that she seemed to know the dynamic being played out in those online videos, where followers and fans just seemed to be waiting for the moth to be consumed by the fire. Sometimes you could watch Amy Winehouse simply taunt the camera by staring into the eyes she sensed were spying on her. Her music may have initially attracted listeners who longed to touch the depths of the despair she plunged into in “Take the Box” (“I just don’t know you, but you make me cry, where’s my kiss goodbye?”), but in the past few years the episodes of total collapse became her true follow-up album to Back to Black.
The truth is, though, that if they know how to find out answers to their questions, and they have curious minds, THEY. WILL. BE. OKAY!! In fact, they will be more than okay, they will thrive!!
Let's kick this off with an inspiration photo:
This is not much, isn't?
Happy Friday!!!! Me and my husband are heading to Ohio tomorrow morning to visit my grandparents! We haven't seen them since last Thanksgiving. We spent a couple days up there visiting with family and my husband went hunting with my cousin. It was a little bit of a different experience up there with all the snow and the freezing temperatures. He loves it though!
Add vanilla, red food coloring, & cocoa and stir well to combine. Quickly pour fudge into prepared pan, and spread in even layer with spatula.
I encourage you no matter what happens in your life praise God, Good or Bad because God, has a plan and the trials will help you trust God, more as well grow closer to Him, as long you don’t get mad at God, for things not going your way… Remember it’s no longer your way it’s God’s, Way and it’s God’s Timing… He has no desire to harm you through these trials…
Of course, being the new mama I was, I read everything about non-dominance training and feared scarring my furchild with abusive training techniques. I practiced positive behavior modification and I absolutely forbid Bryan from pulling too hard on her leash or any other sort of physical correction. I cringed when people pushed her down when she jumped on them. She's my BABY after all.
Hi, friends! A new color combo for the "Going Grey..."series: Grey + Pink!
Happy Saturday! I hope you are enjoying your weekend so far and I hope the weather is better out your way, because it's all sorts of rainy here this morning. Yuck! Guess I better just stay inside with a hot cuppa and get stampy, right?
Littlest broke her finger a few days ago. She was dancing. On the dining room chair. She's fine, in fact, I don't think she remembers her splinted finger until it gets in her way. But at night, she's up two, three or more times. No one has been sleeping. And since I have preternatural hearing, I sleep even less. So this morning, even though husband let me sleep in a little, I was in a miserable mood. After eldest made her way to school and littlest had her breakfast, I opened up email and saw an email from Caryn Wiseman from Andrea Brown Agency. To recap briefly, I posted the first 5 pages of BookEnd during last summers writeoncon. Caryn requested the first three chapters. I sent them in September then heard nothing. In January, I screwed my courage to the sticking point and nudged her. Nothing until today. Now, I've had seven rejections in the last three weeks. I knew without opening it that this was going to be a rejection too. I just felt like someone punched me in the gut, yet still expected me to get out of my PJs and brush my teeth. I cried. Then I figured I might as well open the damn rejection up, stick it in my folder with the others and get on querytracker to collect my latest orange frownie face.
Another high is that we're celebrating the birth of my friend Cindy's son Beckett Paul Bylsma! Beckett was born to proud parents Cindy and Dustin and big brother Caleb yesterday morning. I look forward to visiting them in the hospital this afternoon and meeting the little guy.
*including but not limited to TCM
As we all know, we can't control what life throws at us. All we can control is how we react to the hand we're dealt. Catherine's response to her situation is awe inspiring.
Austerity was named “Word of the Year” for 2010.
Alone in the dividing wall
FBI Special Agent Samantha Kennedy is haunted by memories of the serial killer who abducted her. To keep the darkness at bay, she pretends to be a different, more confident woman. This Samantha doesn't fear every unknown face. So she throws caution to the wind and shares a night of unbridled passion with a handsome stranger.
The priests are found close to Words of Power walls in coffins like other Draugr.
12:00 Los Coronas
Draupadi had to share her life with five men, meaning polyandry. Although not approved of then, men could have many wives! So, Draupadi’s case was rather controversial at that time. Many detested her, calling her a whore while there were many who even envied her! Today, the situation is no different. If a woman is successful both, personally and professionally she is accused of having slept her way up.
If you gain an extra $100 a week, and then work to find out how you can keep the extra money and continue to make it every week, you have changed your comfort zone.
To be blunt, Greek politicians have miserably failed. Wait, that’s not right. You can’t say someone has failed when they haven’t even tried. Let’s be more accurate and say that Greek politicians have succeeded. They have scammed money from taxpayers in other nations to prop up a venal and corrupt system of patronage and spoils. Sure, they’ve made a few cosmetic changes and trimmed around the edges, but handouts from abroad have enabled them to perpetuate a bloated state. And now they’re using a perverse form of blackmail (aided and abetted by big banks) to seek even more money.
Let’s write a test that opens the Google home page on Android and issues a query for “weather in San Francisco”. The test will verify that Google returns search results, and that the first result returned is giving the weather in San Francisco.
The Welsh Government has recently announced that local government is to be 'encouraged' to provide key services in a frame work of six regions broadly similar to the pre 199 counties. The number of councils, and councillors will remain unchanged, but council's will be 'encouraged' or 'required' to jointly appoint key staff. Opponents have argued that this is a council reorganisation, into a smaller number of larger councils, by the back door. It is hard to disagree with them.
1.choose favourite snacks
Keep in mind that one can live with the ‘perfect’ body and have a nasty attitude, while another can be handicapped and still wear a grin on his face each day.
Judgement
There is no crap on tap here.
When that day comes, the masterminds at Platinum Project Marketing might be in line for a royalty cheque. Time and time again, my best commentary comes from ripping their campaigns. Their condo marketing “solutions” are the epitome of the hype problem. I really hope they’re in on the joke they’ve created. If they don’t get the joke, it’s because they are the joke.
We've forsaken the values mankind held long ago
or perhaps some corn bread or fritters.
can't remember what went wrong last September
Mr Livingstone’s image is of a man who gets about London on the Tube and buses. In 2007, he said: ‘Politicians should resist the temptation to glide around in chauffeur-driven cars, and stay in touch with issues that matter to Londoners.’
Words. Phrases. Vocabulary. Subject specific language. We want children to use it in the correct way. We want them to try things out…take risks…be adventurous. We want pupils to identify and ‘magpie’ good ideas and extend their use of the English language. But it’s not always easy – how can we get them using language in the way we want them too? Maybe we need to get creative…
Stop. Don’t throw the laptop. This is NOT another Cleveland bashing, even though to start off it might sound like one. Stick with me here.
** From the forum archives of May 20, 2011
But try to join their clique and it can cause procrastination,
Well…you get the picture (no pun intended). By the time day two had arrived, no one much felt like saying ‘cheese’ and smiling til their cheeks hurt. But it was this woman’s prerogative to snap snap snap until her fingers bled.
To change the interval, edit the number on the line indicating the number of seconds the slider will auto-advance. I typically choose 8 as it gives people time to look, read, and decide, and it isn’t too annoying.
Believe it or not, Eurovision has been waving flags and invading living rooms since 1956 – that’s 56 years of glitter and Lycra and they have been glorious. Amongst this huge mess of forced smiles and block voting there have occasionally been very worthy winners, going some distance to restoring the faith in the collective European mass. Here are a few of the songs that, for varying reasons, more than deserved their spot at the top of the podium.
Ignoring the cost aspect and telling myself the next article I edit will almost pay for the suit (which is true), I ordered a two piece hoodless suit from Splashgear.
I know she will be very suprised and very happy as well. You all wish you had a daughter like me right ? Just kidding.
"I just had a look through the Keyhole to the Universe. And I met someone there that I will never forget -- myself."
(“Eye Of The Tiger” plays while images of sleek, sexy robots appear on a screen all the robots are watching)
Moffat, you have such brilliant moments of awesome, and then you somehow drop the ball, leaving us confused and hanging without wrapping it all up. It’s wonderful to bring up new story questions throughout a series, we want that! But when you put up the plates to spin, you must bring them down by the end of the story (i.e. the season finale). Otherwise, your audience feels cheated. You know this, so stop doing it. We’re still wondering what/who blew up the TARDIS last year?? Bring down the plates!
… but Good beginnings are hard, and usually come about only after you’ve written the end, several drafts down the road. And the more you write, the more you know just how complex and elusive things that look easy can be.
You just know you will have a stiff neck the next day from all that nodding and you will probably not be able to recover your usual mouth shape after stretching your lips into a smile for so many hours. The subtle hints in the form of a yawn or "Hey, is it that late?" gradually lose their subtlety, "Such a pity we've got to work tomorrow," "I'm exhausted and we've such an early start tomorrow", "Don't you have to work tomorrow?" until you finally get up, say goodnight and ask them to lock up after they leave.
The 6th day of our swimming lesson includes 6 laps of heads up with kick board and 6 laps of heads down with kick board. I was surprised that the head coach instructed me to do a streamline swimming. Actually, I have no idea how to do it. Swimming without a kick board, just the kicking drill, I must be able to reach the end of the lane. During my first try, I can’t be able to reach the end because I have no idea how to do the breathing and I tend to usually stop in the middle of the pool. When Coach Ces arrived, I asked her how to do the streamline. She told me that I must raise up and straighten my arms, my head in the between, then my hands overlapping each other. I must separate my overlapped hands while I breathe and if I submerged my face to the water again, I must overlap my both hands again and do bubbles as I exhale. Since I am
I also wonder (and worry) about how a future in which crowdfunding is a big fraction of all funding would shape what science gets funded. As far as I can tell, the Round 1 SciFund data are mostly about relating characteristics of investigators to their funding success. What about characteristics of their science? For instance, are conservation or other applied projects an easier sell than fundamental research? Can you crowdfund theoretical work? Conversely, how easy is it to crowdfund the scientific equivalent of snake oil (or even just a poorly-designed or boring project)? SciFund quite rightly involves investigators sharing advice on how to market their work to the public, and yes, regular research grants also involve some measure of salesmanship. But as anybody who’s ever seen commercial advertisements knows, there’s marketing and there’s marketing. I do wonder if crowdfunded science will end up being driven by what’s marketable, to an extent that would make old fogies like me uncomfortable.
De Wesselow can quote the relevant gospel passages as readily as any Christian preacher. In the book, he takes each and every New Testament reference to the risen Christ – plus a few from the extracanonical texts of the first and second centuries that were excluded from the Authorised Version of the Bible – and rereads them to fit in with his thesis.
My second favorite slow-cooker cookbook is a great story and the result of an extreme blog project. Make It Fast, Cook It Slow: The Big Book of Everyday Slow Cooking by Stephanie O’Dea is the story of one mom tackling the slow-cooker and making every.single.dinner out of this handy appliance for an entire year. The recipes in the book are fool-proof, but if you are like and enjoy eating with your eyes, you might find yourself a bit apathetic when it comes to trying new things with no picture to tempt your senses.
This morning, Chickie took a spill on the hill, and scraped her knee on the asphalt. Nothing requiring stitches or anything, but a pretty bad scrape that started bleeding immediately.
I've made a decision - I'm going to spend more time doing what makes ME happy and try to put all the negativity in my life behind me.
2 fresh avocados, pitted, peeled and diced
Matt has taken the stage at a number of Tea Party-linked events, and was a local emcee for the Berea event. He'll also be fronting Tea Party rallies in Akron and Medina in the next few days. It may be easier to list what Tea Party events Patrick is not attending locally.
to a brighter summer day
In view of that, he welcomed ideas from the Orang Ulu community on how to address the dam related community issues comprehensively.
He told me I was gutsy. That I had a fire inside me. (Ok, was this going to be good, or was it a bad fire inside me?) He asked me to sit down. “I have never had a student write ANYTHING like this before in my class. EVER.” He said that I was a risk-taker, and that he liked that. And that’s why he gave me an A. Not just any old A, but an A+. He asked if he could make a copy of my paper. He already had anywho, and handed mine back. Wow, I did get an A. Who would think that a paper about fornication would awe someone. Yeah, fornication. Written by a college freshman who was naive and who had no first hand knowledge at that time about what she wrote about. But, I think I was creative and knew how to put together sentences. (Unlike now. My grammar leaves much to be desired. But, hey, it’s blogging. There are no rules, right?)
* “The easiest thing to do on earth is not write.” ~ William Goldman
...so, I just wanted to share with you, that sometimes the best source of inspiration comes from taking a break, getting away, and making time to be calm.
If the creation of good food is love, Connie Panebianco shared love often and with an enjoyment in the process as well as the result. Connie is Katie’s mom. She stayed with us in Nashville for a year after being diagnosed with breast cancer. During her radiation and chemotherapy treatments she cooked wonderful dishes nearly every night. At first it was disconcerting- shouldn’t we be the ones cooking for her? But we quickly came to realize that cooking was therapy for Connie. She spent her time in the chemo clinic writing up a list of what she was going to buy, and then swung by Harris Teeter to pick up ingredients on the way home. Cancer brought on an understandable fear and dread. Cooking was her way of keeping her sanity.
Anyhoo, better run, am in Swansea at the moment, and there is Rhymney to be consumed. But not before I say, big up Bexley dudes, hope the rest of the festival went well.
- J
The Philly born and bred Grammy award winning artist who actually began his career as a drummer for The Cadillacs and later Harold Melvin & The Blue Notes was a dynamic musical force who released 20 albums in his lifetime. The passion and seduction he delivered his ballads with powered him to superstar status in the 70's and early 80's and forged his place amongst the best vocalist's of all time.
50gr chopped nuts
13. Do you cook at home often? If so, what do you cook?
And now, America, I ask you to imagine this boy, set in a foreign country where most did not speak his language. Imagine him, barely verbal, left there amongst strangers. No more mother. No more dazzling Malcolm.
THIS DT CALL CLOSED ON MONDAY EVENING, 20TH JUNE
Mocknick: The covers pitching, submissions, phone calls, contract negotiations (in the event of a sale) and all aspects of representation.
Enjoy my favourite frames from Joyce and Jimmy's big day, who had a gorgeously elegant and intimate wedding celebration at this beautiful Italian restaurant on Sentosa Island, Singapore. Their taste was impeccable!!
Bogeying the 11th - Rory didn’t panic and was able to keep his head and find some form on the remaining holes.
“We raised and marketed a brand of natural, hormone free, Piedmontese
I then asked her if she knew where she would go when she died. She answered, “I would hope heaven, but you can’t know that until you die.”
Moon could see that Stella had some obnoxious looking human attempting to put a collar around her neck!
I wanted to continue my look into phrasal verbs. This is such a tricky area of English for my intermediate and early advanced language learners. I wanted to learn more about them and share what I discovered. I found out that there are 3 types of multi-word verbs: phrasal verbs, prepositional verbs and phrasal-prepositional verbs.
If you’re looking for some extra savings, be sure to sign up with Home Made Simple to get a coupon booklet with over $25.00 in savings mailed to your house. If you are already a P&G Everyday member, then you can sign in using your account. Otherwise, you will be prompted to create a new account. After signing in, check the box to get your coupons and select submit. Confirm your selection and your address, and the coupons booklet should be mailed to your house! Below is a list of coupons included in the booklet:
Every writer needs a support group, and I have a wonderful one. My friends and family have been absolutely fantastic from the get-go. There's something they always say, though, and until recently, I just thought they were being nice: "I'm so proud of how far you've come."
The Sound Of Drums
that is waiting
“There’s a mighty big piece of country in between here and the Rio Grande.”
I blog because I work 40+ hours a week in a technical field and manage a large global team so I am often operating on minimal sleep and switching modes from career to wife/mother isn’t always easy…
Very early in the morning on Friday, May 20, I was reading entries on a forum where supporters and detractors of Harold Camping’s prediction of Judgment Day May 21 had been exchanging opinions for a long time. The detractors seemed to be in the majority on the forum, but a few die-hard True Believers were still posting on there by May 20 also, spending what they believed to be their last hours on Earth among heathen scoffers.
Why is An Affair to Remember such a satisfying film? The casting is superb. Cary Grant is the perfect lady’s man who starts out, determined to marry a beautiful girl for her money, but still playing the field. Deborah Kerr portrays the sympathetic, but worldly wise woman who has been a rich man’s mistress. I think the reason this movie works so well, is that the characters do not lie to themselves or to each other — they admit their flaws with charm and humor. Then they are humbled by true love. They’re motivated to change, but they’re wise enough to know that they might fail, which would be heart breaking. The last half hour of the film is melodramatic, but it makes me cry every time. I want love to be a redemptive force. I want to believe that it is never too late to be a better person and to find true love.
He hired some of the best American silversmiths whose sumptuous pieces started winning international prizes. They can now be found in the New York Metropolitan Museum of Art, as well as in the company’s private collection – pieces like an American Indian0inspired loving cup.
In my earlier post I defined lack of executive function and talked about the problems it can cause in day-to-day scenarios involving simple tasks, like getting dressed. As children get older however, executive functioning difficulties become more pronounced because they're expected to be able to take responsibility for more far-reaching decisions.
I bought a roll of hemp twine which is kind of expensive but I didn't use the whole roll. I've got plenty left for other projects.
Vert: 18,100'
wonderful offer that I have designed for you.
Since this was too long, we gave you the nickname Marcie which means lively. Plus it's Mark & Gracie combined. :)
CONSERVATIVE: Pie pasty pie pie.
We sort to connect those sounds with down to earth lyrics. Those of day-to-day pointlessness and banality.
This is my project and I needed a pattern from ravelry so I am going to share :)
We did not realise at the time but the tide was fairly well in when we first got there and would probably have been the best time to swim if we were going to take our chances. The aunties said the crocs come in with the tide but apart from then it was usually safe to swim. LOL! I think if we went again we would know where and when to go for a swim but this time we thought it better safe than sorry.
I help the children finish their homework quickly so I can begin making a delicious and nutritious meal for my family. That family of mine with whom I lovingly chat with about their day as well as crack jokes and playful teasing. I still have time to clean up the dinner mess before we rush off for their sports that night. There, I will sit in the cold rain and watch them practice a sport they sort of like. I will not sit in my van to Facebook, or read, or write tomorrow’s list of things to do, or make a grocery list. No. I sit and watch them.
This will be interesting for most, because I love implementing method on the cocktail, not just the quality of ingredients. You are not going to shake this cocktail, but rather layer and not stir. Fill a rocks glass with ice, pour the vodka over the ice first, followed by the sweet and sour, and using whatever room you have left in the glass to top with tonic water. As you sip on the cocktail whether from the rim or a stirring straw, gently shake the glass every few minutes to get a little mix going over a longer period of time.
Either way, I’m still Baptist.
Since my back is still out, I doubt I will ride to work tomorrow (I am not happy about that). I will give my back a few more days to heal, then it’s back in the saddle. I hope you have a great weekend, I know I did. See you back here Monday for more coffee, Greenline, and bikes. Cheers.
Case in point was at my last job where two times a month I had to work Saturday and Sunday, which often conflicted with my weekend National Guard duties. This was a manufacturing plant and my associates loved mouthing off about the evil bad guys and how super-duper great our glorious troops were at blowing them up. Their support of the troops last only as long as they did not have to cover my weekend shift. See my service to the country at a time of war disturbed their hunting and fishing time and they resented the Hell out of it.
I enjoyed the meal so much that during the week I went back there for lunch on my own while J was at a class. I took a book along with me and sat in one of the little booths and felt quite comfortable eating alone. The atmosphere is very relaxed.
We're all born upon the cross
It becomes pretty obvious early on that the story of the bug is an allegory for the isolation of the teenage experience. While this is an interesting way to explore a topic that has been done over and over again, the author/illustrator Charles Burns decided to add another layer to the story by adding a murder mystery element. Basically what happens is that someone starts killing off the kids who have contracted the bug. This gives the story a bit of a horror element too I guess, but it never really resonated with me.
39 - Mike Squires
And my manager witnessed all of this.
﻿Mr de Charette stared at her as if he had seen a ghost.
Fuck it, don't bother.
The soldier flower that affronts
But one of the British generals at Bunker Hill, Henry Clinton, wrote in his diary after the battle: “A few more such victories would have surely put an end to British dominion in America.”
“It is inadmissible that Brazil, which has one of the most solid and profitable financial systems, continues to have some of the highest interest rates in the world,” Rousseff said in a television address ahead of the May Day holiday.
We still need to add the base shoe and grout the tile area so ignore the gnarliness at the bottom as it will be covered.
The Premium Edition set not only includes the awesome double-sided box with great artwork but also a 36-page hardcover book that contains great artwork, storyboards, episode synopsis, character profiles and glossary of terms that is worth a glance. The second disc comes with some extras such as a few trailers and the clean opening and closing animation.
By:.
Mrs Mackay said she was given a report on him by the council – saying he joined in ‘family routines’ and ‘will wash up when asked’ – but it was far from reality.
Written by: Chris Boucher
Partnering to Improve Maternity Care Quality Act of 2010 (HR 6437)
What really concerns me is something more pressing than statistics, which are always questionable anyway. I am bothered about the effect that all these "discoveries" are having upon the morale of ordinary classroom teachers, who, despite what you might read in the Daily Mail, are overwhelmingly hard working, caring people. I know that they will be dismayed by yet another attack upon them and their status in the eyes of the public. If you are told repeatedly that you are not doing a good job, then you can get to believe it. As I have pointed out in previous posts, OFSTED pressure has already led to teacher suicides. This latest issue, timed suspiciously shortly after the appointment of Sir Michael, will not help.
Hopefully, you don't just run for chocolate and Tiffany&Co.
Will so be looking forward to Sunday so I can just chilax how about you what will you all be getting up to? What ever it may be I hope its full of good times :)))
And so when I finally lose it and grab my baseball bat and beat every liberal I come across to a violent and gory death, you liberals had damned well better smile tolerantly and say, “I’m so happy that you’re finally free to express your true self.” And don’t you ever forget that you can’t blame a person for violent behavior any more than you can blame that homosexual.
here are the colours that I've bought
Heartfelt apologies to Howard Blake (and, indeed to Raymond Briggs). But this parody has been begging to be written for years, and I finally got around to putting fingers to keyboard…
Happy Birthday, Luke.
Burt Prelutsky—6/21/10
Richard Lord
before you 'drop' the tablet and then hold on to the sides of the bed
Angie Malone is the youngest sister of a family who owns an Italian restaurant. She struggles with infertility issues, and she is battling the grief of losing her father, an early birth and loss of her daughter, and a divorce from the love of her life. Lauren Ribido is a young girl seeking love and affection from her distant alcoholic mother. Together these two characters are joined by a mutual need and end up teaching each other about family and love.
So here goes. This week’s Friday Five…
We live at the dawn of a scientific revolution, every day brings new findings from a wide range of scientific disciplines about what it means to be human. Modern science now gives us the detailed descriptions of the mechanisms our brain needs to construct what we call the self.
It was funnier if you were there.
“Okay,” I replied. But he was already walking away, leaving me standing alone at the entrance.
I saw a notice that Henning Wehn, German comedy ambassador ("not an easy job") was playing at the Spa Centre, which is within walking distance. I don't generally keep an eye on the listings, because the venue usually hosts acts such as 'Brass Band plays Mantovani' or 'Gerald Williams, Hypnotist to the Stars'. The tickets were very reasonably priced, as Herr Wehn is pretty well known on radio but has not yet made it to the big time on TV.
The campaign is generating an ambiguous reaction from an electoral constituency that, at least at first glance, would appear to be a natural ally: religiously conservative men.
Please Don't Forget To Edit Your Twitter Username Before Replacing. 07 Jan 2011
Now, this is not to say that I am not incredibly thankful to all of the veterans out there for everything that they have done. Because I am. But I was somewhat anxious about doing my psychiatry rotation there, as that entire area of medicine has a different flavor than any other.
06-01 Philadelphia, PA – Trocadaro
Comment: Are you a fan of quirky facts? Are your kids?
God, please.
Stitches required:
Does that blouse look familiar? It should. I can't get this J. Crew blouse out of my head lately. After posting about it last week, I decided to show you exactly how I would style it if that little gem was part of my spring/summer wardrobe. A day of shopping, meeting friends for brunch, casual Friday at work - the possibilities are endless!
Water Boy
-Be great in act, as you have been in thought.
Which I took and finished.
Here “zodiac” may be taken at face value, but in reference to the collection that follows, can also be interpreted as the unique constellations of life- and attitude-shaping influences (both negative and positive) into which we are initially born, and which do shift as we grow and come into our own as autonomous beings. Without insight into these shifts, a means of measuring them, old influences can continue to exert unjustifiable power within our psyches.
So in my trawls through the darker side of the Internets I ran across two of their records. Now, having heard of this alleged slowcore (I hate that term) act in passing, and liked the record they made with Califone as a combo called Loftus, I figured I'd give them a listen in their own right.
Below the outfit I was sporting at the party, this crazy cool boiler suit made me feel ready for anything!
This was, without question, the best writing workshop I've ever attended. (And I've been to a few.)
I made this card for a friend of ours who will be graduating soon. Can you remember those days? Gettting ready to graduate High School?
So, my blanket is all sewn together, each of those 20×20 squares. It was quite challenging to do to make sure that it all lined up and wasn’t wonky – It is a bit! Oh well, first try and all that. All I’ve got to do is sew a material on the ‘back’ of it then turn it inside out so I will have one side with the patches and one side with a full material.
It is particularly important that all cats are registered and are confined during the curfew hours; for their welfare and for the sake of native wildlife.
How many sleepless nights must my ghost leave my body
I was working on a page for my heritage album so out on the floor is also the drawer where I keep all my vintage bits, the plastic box I keep all the papers for the album in and also the box of photos I had been sorting through.
Everybody can love sports. From those who will wait hours to get tickets for a certain game to those who could not be paid enough money to sit through three innings of baseball, there is surprisingly still something to appeal to. The hardest part is how to reach that audience successfully, no matter where they may fall on the spectrum. In the world of magazine journalism, there is a niche for everyone, and using sports reveals just how far these niches can reach. Both the New Yorker and MAXIM tackle a commentary piece on how sports are being run today, yet they manage to write two drastically different articles to reach audiences far and wide.
A: Atty. Ferdinand Topacio
Since a lot of my volunteer work with the school is about “empowering” kids, I found myself considering the idea that a simple pencil with some eraser left could mean a lot in a classroom where a lot of mistakes have been made in the course of learning. Kids’ needs are often simple but simple doesn’t mean unimportant. So it seemed somewhat fateful that shortly after the experience Sheree Brown from Penquis contacted me regarding their Smart Starts for Students Campaign.
I then used ribbon from Lidl, and a bow from Papermania Capsule collection range, with a Prima flower. Lastly I added my buttons which are recycled from old shirts :-)
So great was James' holiness of life that men strove one with another to touch the hem of his garment. When he was ninety-six years old, and had most holily governed the Church of Jerusalem for thirty years, ever most constantly preaching Christ the Son of God, he laid down his life for the faith. He was first stoned, and afterward taken up on to a pinnacle of the Temple and cast down from thence. His legs were broken by the fall, and he was well nigh dead, but he lifted up his hands towards heaven, and prayed to God for the salvation of his murderers, saying " Lord, forgive them, for they know not what they do " As he said this, one that stood by smote him grievously upon the head with a fuller's club, and he resigned his spirit to God. He testified in the seventh year of Nero, and was buried hard by the Temple, in the place where he had fallen. He wrote one of the Seven Epistles which are called Catholic.
Daughter: nothings the matter
A living stream
Julian Payne, head of communications at BBC Vision, told the Western Mail it was a “fantastically exciting” time for fans.
HANCOCK COUNTY, W.Va. — A Hancock County man was arrested late Wednesday evening after, police said, he mutilated and killed 29 dogs and held a woman captive for several months.
"Food hubs play a critical role in developing stronger supply chains and addressing the infrastructure challenges while supporting food access, regional economic development and job creation."
“I’m just going to miss you, Bianca.” I confessed, “Two weeks went by like a minute.”
Far Cry 2
It was a great job for the interim of my personal time off from my job with the Shoreline School District as a substitute paraeducator working with the special needs children. This experience gave me an insight of what it takes to work with the general public. I worked at Nordstrom a long time ago and though...wow(!) that was hard BUT this brought my confidence level with the public to a whole new level.
The VL also complain that they no longer see South African National Defence Force personnel along the frontier. A company was deployed to Wepener in the southwest Free State in April last year s part of Operation Corona.
Humility
Admirable Theft Auto: Carnality City-limits Stories
Well luckily, sat on the common overlooking Black Lake, it wasn't that cold, although we were instantly besieged by swarms of tiny confused insects, with whom alas I have an unrivalled reputation as a great tasting snack. In fact, by the time we reached our first pub I was still feeling the aftereffects of my being nibbled, so was looking forward to a beer to distract me.
officers, both serving and retired
She knows an impressive amount of French words for a 5 year old.
6. Oh, I couldn't! No one wants to hear me sing karaoke.
What weather we have had when I blogged last time we were in the middle of a one off March heatwave then week later it SNOWED!! Now it’s back to being chilly and wet …. Roll on Summer!!
But putting all THAT aside - I did find the right-sized needles and began the Knitting Project:
Bigger than a logo
Me: “Josh, you tell me this every time we come over here and we never find it. What makes you think you can this time?”
She replied, “Well, when I checked in with the airline, they put a tag on my luggage that said FAT, and I’m overweight, is there any connection?”
bags, lunch boxes
I required 52 trifles,10 diners having opted out and requested ice cream instead.
...do as the Wisconsinites do?
And while we are on the subject of noise, enough already with your Tourette’s style obsession with slamming doors, windows, cupboards and drawers. You now live in a place where you share walls with other human beings. It constantly sounds as if a herd of bulls is loudly ransacking your apartment. Please quiet the hell down and show some consideration for the people that live above and beside you.
Ryan: our soldiers are rebuilding Afghanistan
So it's time to WAR! If you want to fight for souls, then bring it on! Bring your "A" game. You don't have a fighting chance to takes souls away from God. They are His for the keeping. Echoed by John 10:28. We will continue to preach the Word in season and out of season. (2 Timothy 4:2) All the Glory will go to God and Satan and his cronies, such as yourselves, will be cast into the eternal fire.
Grassy-sweet odor of freshly-mown hay
A while ago I kept banging on about the Pixies, since when I don't think I've mentioned music much. One of the things that gets me to put a cd* on is to drown out the awareness of the low-level noise coming from our neighbours. The random amateur carpentry games their 4 year old plays, the accelerating vocalisms of their baby. Not the shouty lady who rants at her husband, who we recently discovered has taken to peppering his gujarati with "fuck off". 50 years in this country, and the local dialect is rubbing off on him... No, we are blessed not only to live in a terrace, but one in which the party walls** on either side are Very Thin. So I'm listening to Think Tank, the massively vermillion-fabric'd cd Blur did about 9 years back. Damon Albarn and Kristin Hersh's voices are always good to re-tilt the axis in a mad day...
South Florida is a bit of an outlier, geographically speaking, but overall the conference lays out pretty nicely. The only dog in the Big East from last season’s won-loss standpoint is Syracuse.
And live with the agony,
There was a shit ton happening this week so I know I’m going to be spending a lot of time recapping the episode. Please bear with me. At Renly’s camp, King Renly (one of five) strikes up a nighttime deal with Catelyn Stark to allow Robb to still be King of the North if he allies himself with Renly to defeat Stannis and the Lannisters. As he’s taking his armor off to retire for the evening, the shadowy smoke monster that Mellisandre birthed last week appears in his tent and stabs him through the chest. In the chaos afterwards, Renly’s Kingsguard blames Brienne for the attack and she has to fight her way out. She wants to stay and guard the body of Renly but Cately convinces her that she’ll be murdered by Renly’s men if they catch her and they flee together. The next day, Loras and Margaery mourn the loss of the King (one his lover, the other his Queen) when Littlefinger convinces them that siding with him (which I’m assuming/know means the Lannisters) saves their lives and implies to Margaery that she could still be Queen yet. Back in King’s Landing, Cersei and Tyrion hear the news of Renly’s death which means that Stannis now has all of Renly’s bannermen (which means he outnumbers the Lannisters on land and sea). Tyrion is the only one who seems to understand how serious this situation has become (and why sending Myrcella to Dorne is actually in her best interest). Still, Cersei insists on keeping Joffrey’s battle strategy a secret from Tyrion despite the fact that Tyrion is obviously smarter than everyone else in the capital. After interrogating/humiliating Lancel some more, we find out that Joffrey wants to use the Westeros equivalent of napalm against Stannis’ forces. It’s called wildfire and it can burn through steel and melt flesh. One false move and it could easily destroy King’s Landing as swiftly as Stannis’ army. Obviously, Tyrion steps in and takes the reins from his nephew and places himself in charge of the defense of the capital.
Anyway have an awesome weekend everyone - and to Krit HAVE an awesome time in Florida with your sisters! - HAPPY 30th HOT STUFF!!!!! - can't wait to hear ALLLLLLLLLL about the Key's and Miami!!!
It was a long slog, yes, but nothing I didn’t expect. I’d always wanted to write, but in a defeatist way I thought getting published would be impossible. So when I lived abroad for twelve years – I was jobless and childless and I had so much time I really should have been turning out two fat sagas a year or something – I wrote and sold short stories. I didn’t really enjoy them – I don’t think I’m that good at short stories – but I assumed I’d never sell anything longer, and I couldn’t think what to write anyway.
“Precious in the sight of the Lord is the deatyh of his saints.” psalm 116-15
"Home is where the heart is and where the heart is there is home"
Monsters/Villains: Caven, Dervish, Space Pirates.
of a relaxed cut, but also it has something that makes
Obama Democrats constantly whine that their out-of-control spending is the fault of the Republicans. Sometimes it’s the bunch that took majority control of the House of Representatives in January 2011. Sometimes it’s the long-retired former President Bush.
I started a new blog as I don't yet have that Great South African Novel inside me but I just want to write all day.
He was not joking.
Skincare is for real. I love wrinkles on men and women. It's soft, it's natural and it shows their battles. My mom's wrinkles show her struggles with health. My grandmother's arms were fleshy wrinkles that extended into soft hugs.
To explain the story of its genesis, Tanzania is suffering from national power shortages, and as a result, it is implementing power rationing. One day, I returned home, only to notice the power cut. So, I pulled out my charcoal stove and fixed an instant noodle lunch, and realized, hey this would be a half-decent advertisement.
halfway between Dallas and Fort Worth, Texas. She is presently a novelist, freelance writer and amateur historian. In other times and other places she has been a radio network vice president, a reference librarian, a business-to-business magazine editor, and a tutor in
My pink and brown quilt in progress. Outer border attached- check. Backing and batting attached-check. I am in the process of hand quilting the quilt. Sigh. It is going to take forever since I am also quilting words in some of the blocks. I really need to get started on learning how to machine quilt. I have everything except the extension table.
Hours Read: 1--kind of.
Drew Magary, The End Specialist: "Another nostalgic effort is Drew Magary’s The End Specialist . . . Not bad precedents with which to be compared, perhaps, but this is not a literature of reminders, of retreads, of slightly updated versions of existing works."
By introducing a legal ‘drug limit’ the Government is essentially trying to do away with the requirement for the police to demonstrate ‘impairment’. In order for this to work any ‘drug limit’ would have to correspond with the likely limit that would be exceeded following recent drug use.There is no point testing for a drug which someone might or might not have taken several days or weeks ago. This is unlikely to have any impact on their driving and to be prosecuted on the basis of ‘historic’ drug abuse would be inherently unfair.
31,399 tons of goods entered Gaza last week Fail Of The Day Chinese Man Cons Sky News MORON: Bush Praises Arab Spring; George W. – Father of Islamic “Democracy’ Differences prisoner agreement lessons between Arabic and English Turkey’s Middle East Policy of Seeking To Gobble, Gobble Up the Middle East Makes Enemies of Everyone IDF holds joint earthquake simulation drill with U.S. Army Barry Rubin: Turkey’s Middle East Policy of Seeking To Gobble, Gobble Up the Middle East Makes Enemies of Everyone Оксидентализм. О природе ненависти к Западу.I Military Intelligence closely monitor ‘Google Street View’ project in Israel “Muslim Brotherhood sent convoy of doctors to mutilate girls” OMG: US Congressman writes constituent that Sharon and Arafat must negotiate Mohammad Rashid Responds to Corruption & Embezzlement Charges The Middle East Media Sampler 5/16/1012: J-Street Condemns Abbas? Soccer Dad’s Middle East Media Sampler The Dictator And Katy Perry A Look At The Forward’s Eli Valley’s Antisemitic Inspirations Sorry, BDSers, but Israel’s economy continues to grow Egyptian Authorities Seize More Weapons From Libya The soft bigotry of low expectations Putin: ‘Israel will take care of Iran,’ Khameni: Clash between Iran, US and Israel ‘inevitable’ Gaza export totals this season 16-May-12: Ten years late, the assault on financial corruption at the highest levels of Palestinian government may finally be going somewhere Palestinian doctors attend international conference at Israeli hospital B’Tzelem’s Montell compares right wing Israelis to neo-Nazis Why Israel’s Secure Borders Are Imperative–Even In The Age Of Modern Warfare (Israel: Why Land Matters, Part III) Why peace is impossible, reason #6350 Video: Jerusalem–4000 Years in 5 Minutes You mean Israeli prisons aren’t hotels? Former PA Mufti says Jerusalem not holy to Jews How Israel went from underdog to ‘oppressor’ in 40 years InLightPress: We Are Still Being Censored By The Palestinian Authority “The Dictator” Mocks Slain Israeli Olympic Athletes, Avoids Insulting (or Mentioning) Islam; Anti-US Occupy Monologue Nakba Protester Of the Day
back of my head that kept repeating, “You should be sleeping, and you know
He says, "We need to eat I am making something."
What is the light?
Hagey et al. (2007) posit that the brachial gland exudate is used as olfactory signalling to broadcast individual home range and territories. Most nocturnal primates rely on olfaction -- slow loris included. Since brachial gland exudates are not an immediate response to stress or pursuit, their function might be to deter predators, warn other slow lorises of danger or even both (Hagey et al., 2006).
Anyway, cute spot, with nerds being nerds always. Etta James' At Last is the track, which of course is a wedding song for millions of people. Me & the Husband included.
So this is what a proper break up is like. No, not the kind that I'm used to- the ones where serialheartbreakerrelationshiphopperjunkie me just cries into the arms of my new found love and everything is forgotten. This time round I have no one to latch on for security; I only have myself ( & the dozen other fantastic friends that I've confided in) to tell me that every thing's going to be all right!
Today we baked Valentine's Day cookies. My children have classes at church on Thursdays (except Kiddo #1, who now volunteers as a helper :-)) and they asked about bringing in special treats for their friends. I thought we could make homemade cookies. Who could refuse delicious home-baked cookies? :-) And, especially on a cold and wintery day? We are baking lots of batches so we can enjoy them, as well.
More able were the V-class Voc robots, who had the power of speech. In the absence of humans, Vocs performed essential control deck duties on a Sandminer and were capable of running the vehicle without organic supervision. They wore green tunics.
Original Air Date: Apr 10, 2012
It has been almost a year since I last blogged, and I thought I should update this blog and hopefully be better at blogging. I'm going to focus more on blogging about my training for the half-marathon I've signed up for in June, as well as the normal events life brings.
Today I’m participating in a mass blogging day! WOW! Women On Writing has gathered a group of blogging buddies to write about Special People We Know and Love. Why? We’re celebrating the release of Joanne Lewis’ and Amy Lewis Faircloth’s debut novel. Wicked Good (Telemachus Press, LLC, 2011) is about the unconditional love between a mother and her adopted, special needs son and the adventure that brings them closer together. Visit The Muffin at http://muffin.wow-womenonwriting.com to read what Joanne and Amy have to share about their special people and view the list of all my blogging buddies. Then be sure to visit http://www.amyandjoanne.com/ to learn more about the authors.
My thighs? There's the rub.
Freed up slightly from my planned schedule I went to the bank, and then had three different food stores to go to armed with my coupons and ad specials. At my first stop and on top of my first list (I need a manager, I really do) were two bunches of asparagus. I located them in the back in the vegetable section, an obvious optimum choice of location, situated on a huge pyramid type display. Naturally, the bunches in the middle looked the nicest so I pulled one then another out. Like a house of cards about twenty of the ones on top began to walk off the display crashing to the floor. Broken spears were flying all over the place. “Clean up in the Vegetable Section.” Apologizing to the disgruntled clerk, I bought my paltry items probably worth half of the broken asparagus and slunk out the front door with my small bag. Sorry.
because you aren't going to get both.
Dieting triggers bulimia’s destructive cycle of binging and purging. The irony is that the more strict and rigid the diet, the more likely it is that you’ll become preoccupied, even obsessed, with food. When you starve yourself, your body responds with powerful cravings—its way of asking for needed nutrition.
The Upsetters - Saw Dust
Months passed and the feelings I had for him grew stronger. That’s when I decided it was time to tell him what I felt. I couldn’t hide it anymore. On April 14th, we went to the park together and we got onto swings that were side by side.
Anyway, it was about this time that I got distracted. I saw a craigslist post for a free desk, a free dresser, and a free highchair. I snatched them up for a quick turn around for some cash. A saturday of sanding and painting gave yielded us $800 dollars for the price of gas to pick the free stuff up, paint for them, and a few drawer pulls, and we sold everything within the week.
Road Trippin’
This is my Happy Place.
Anyway, I love my little ball of craziness but have been happily lured into a sense of security for the last six months because she seems to have calmed down somewhat. My bad. She really is a sneaky little imp! For the last several nights she's been literally bouncing off the walls at bedtime. She swings from the rails on her bunk bed, has thrown balloons into the moving ceiling fan in her room, punched her almost 10 year old sister in the eye for not listening to her singing and has gotten out of bed a bajillion times to "go".
The Mod dogs and Rocker dogs all nodded their heads in agreement and understanding.
They all nodded in agreement: a couple Vanguards were nothing they couldn’t handle.
Won't be the daily death of me
I made the banner on my Cricut with the Alphabet Cartridge and hung it on my fireplace. I found the free printables here and I bought the shamrock at JoAnn's for $1.99! I am loving my wreath because I can add a little touch for each holiday!
their deposit to be returned he replied via a text that began, “LOL”.”
Cocktails isn’t all that Socio Rehab serve though, with wines and beers including Heinekan, Moretti and Asahi available amongst an array of soft drinks. Next on the cocktail list for me however was a Culross which involves Bacardi Superior, Lillet, apricot liqueur and lemon juice. Served in a rather stunning gimlet, much to the envy of two fellow patrons, it was a fantastic end to a unfortunant brief visit.
This is a film that was shot in May of 2008. It has some very interesting footage. I saw it when it first came out, but have never BLOGGED about it until now. It really gets good around 2:15. What we are seeing is a craft that appears to be under the control of intelligent beings that are inside it. When Dr. Roger Leir attended the UFO convention in Turkey he commented that the saw UFOs nightly. They came in real close to where Leir’s observation point was. He actually saw the entities through the windows in the craft…. This is the same type of phenomena that we are seeing around 4:43 where we get a decent close up of the craft. It appears that there are figures that are visible. However, you be the final judge. Can you imagine if this video was shown to the public 50 years ago? I believe the reaction would have been much different than the ho-hum attitude that most people have regarding this type of footage. The point I’m making is this. We have been conditioned to accept these sightings. We have been inundated with movies and films that show exactly the type of craft that we see in the video above, so now most people who look at this shrug it off! 5o years ago this video would have caused quite a stir. I believe we are being slowly conditioned to accept the arrival, disclosure, and full revealing of the so-called extraterrestrial presence. We are being set up to believe that all life was genetically created by E.T. That they were the gods our ancestors worshipped and they are now back at this critical juncture in our societal evolution to helps us. One thing is for certain, they’re not going away are they? The UFO phenomena is continuing, and these craft move with impunity in the skies over all the countries of the world.
Brown (the Independent Republican) vs. Warren (In Obama's Pocket Democrat)- the MA Senate Race 2012 - image talkingpointsmemo
"I just miss -- I miss being anonymous," he said at the meeting in the White House State Dining Room. "I miss Saturday morning, rolling out of bed, not shaving, getting into my car with my girls, driving to the supermarket, squeezing the fruit, getting my car washed, taking walks. I can't take a walk."
Progress has been slow the past week or so on the Troll despite a hefty package of parts arriving from Chain Reaction Cycles.
Obviously… on this occasion, I am not able to support, condone or agree with such a ‘misconceived and illiberal’ statement from Cicero. Sláinte.
We discussed in the interview how Ponce Corps has zero long-term debt. Its earnings per share have grown every year since at least 2002, when they were 58 cents a share. I know the success at Ponce Corps is due to the mutually beneficial relationships between the 50,000 contract carriers. If I had the opportunity to be part of your team, I would go out of my way to provide the best service possible to the contract carriers. I learned from the reps at Ponce Corps that the prices are all based on the market. Produce season drives the market into the broker’s favor while other times the market flips and it’s the broker who can struggle to make a profile.
Yes, we’re going to lil’ swim class. I’m so excited because she absolutely loves taking baths. Did you take lessons as a baby/kid? I know I took lessons when I was 5-6 years old. I know I’ve mentioned several times that I am a terrible swimmer. I mean, I can swim to save my life but that’s about it. I really would like to take lessons though because it really is a great form of exercise. Oh wait, I’d need a gym membership though. I guess I can do without it.
Parking is OK.
It's been nearly a year since I've updated this blog. Life intervened, as they say, and my energies were focused elsewhere. But what better time and reason to return than to celebrate Björk's birthday? As she turns 42 on November 21st, she is able to look back upon an interesting and active year. It was a year in which she delivered a new album that defied expectations, made a spellbinding appearance at the Coachella Music Festival, and set upon an international tour performing awe-inspiring rearrangements of her most enduring songs.
Bake the pretzels for 8 to 9 minutes, or until they're golden brown, reversing the baking sheets halfway through.
CSS (BR)
Note that these are not "nobodies" that no one will listen to: this is from the National Institutes of Health and Duke University. Because they're unwilling to accept any historical standards of right and wrong, they feel free to define their own standards. This has happened before in history: the eugenics movement that culminated in the Nazi holocaust comes to mind, but Margaret Sanger's American eugenics movement that tried to sterilize and eliminate children from blacks, minorities and the disabled was cut from the same cloth, only a more modest cut. Her organization is, of course, known today as Planned Parenthood.
"But by heaven they're sure to see there's more to Martin Guerre than a name!"
SH: But what if their OCR system matches on the string "18th" instead of "18?" What you write has to match what's already in the system, which is "18th."
Jessica's dessert: rosetta cookies / warm spiced chocolate. I was pretty inspired by the cookies. They are light, airy, with a perfect amount of crunch and structure in the delicate cookies. Jessica explained that she received the molds from her grandmother, and you would dip the molds into batter, and then into hot oil for frying. I know a dessert is good when I leave wondering how I could recreate them at home. I did look up a bunch of rosetta cookie molds if that's any indication. The warm chocolate had a hint of spice that reminded me of a cross between Christmas and Indian cooking. I'd have to eat it again to tell you the exact spice profile. Darn. What a difficult task, but I'll do it. Again, and again, and again. Lenoir can be pretty busy, so call ahead. Congrats to Todd and Jessica!
So I decided to go with something a bit more exotic since the dress for some reason reminds me of the jungle.
tribe is something fragile. Something which some far distant business man in a suit sitting in an air-conditioned office has declared to be of ethnological interest, anthropologically endangered, linguistically moribund, or simply primitive. Something which may not endure another generation, if great care isn’t taken to preserve its present nature. Why these things need preserving, I’m not quite sure. It’s like when city-dwelling folk see a tribesman using a cell-phone and think how terrible it is that Western culture is polluting the simple ways of the native peoples.
Per diem, a Latin term meaning “per day,” is a way for truckers to recover a portion of the expenses they incur while traveling long distances away from home for work. Instead of paying the actual travel expenses, per diem pays only a percentage of expenses incurred while traveling for work.
Cathy and I thought it was great that it was at our house (and it did mean that we had to give the house quite a good clean!) There were 15 adults (with another four joining us for dinner on Saturday night), up to four children (aged 7-10) and three under ones. Having it in a home helped make it a relaxed atmosphere and it encouraged people to stay for dinner. Catering was low-key – for lunch we bought a whole lot of salad, dips and bread rolls, and for dinner a few of us brought something to share. We had plenty of snacks too.
By his side a girl of maybe sixteen holds his ghostly hand, black ringlets cascade down her back.
Also, the baking time is very, very long because you want these cookies to be crunchy. The thinner you slice them, the shorter the baking time (and the more fragile the cookies). But thinner makes them delightfully crispy.
Mark 16:15-18 (KJV) “And He said to them, Go ye into all the world, and preach the gospel to every creature. He that believeth and is baptized shall be saved; but he that believeth not shall be damned. And these signs shall follow them that believe; In my name shall they cast out devils; they shall speak with new tongues; They shall take up serpents; and if they drink any deadly thing, it shall not hurt them; they shall lay hands on the sick and they shall recover.”
Light and Shadow:
You may call me anything but no matter what you say
After leaving the Army after W.W.II, Bob Wallace and Phil Davis team up to become a top song-and-dance act. Davis plays matchmaker and introduces Wallace to a pair of beautiful sisters (Betty and Judy) who also have a song-and-dance act. When Betty and Judy travel to a Vermont lodge to perform a Christmas show, Wallace and Davis follow, only to find their former commander, General Waverly, is the lodge owner. A series of romantic mix-ups ensue as the performers try to help the General.
So, the general question implied is, when two men (or women) are in dispute, and there isn’t an economic/governmental assured ending, isn’t what happens a question of our possibilities for social interaction? Can’t we all get along . . . even if someone looses a tooth here and there?
Yes it is being played for laughs.
Nineteen men were part of the expedition at some point of other; a third of them died, including the leaders Robert O’Hara Burke and William John Wills; only one, John King, actually made it across Australia and back.
Q. Why is the list so short. Is this all the property assets in NAMA?
A Borderline suffers a kind of emotional hemophilia; she lacks the clotting mechanism needed to moderate her spurts of feeling. Stimulate a passion, and the borderline emotionally bleeds to death ~ source: Jerold Kreisman and Hal Straus, I hate You, Don’t Leave Me: Understanding Borderline Personality Disorder.
God's Love And Mercy
In fact.......the sensible thing to do would have been for me to have come on here on Wednesday night and put up a post saying "NOTICE TO ALL BLOGLAND CRAFTERS GOING TO THE KINGS HALL TOMORROW!!! If you want to know who Crafty Loops is and wanna say hello.........just look out for the 5ft 9", 21 year old skinny runt with bright VIOLET hair........and Crafty Loops is the one trying to pretend not to be with her." Yes thats right, I picked my sister up this morning and she got into my car with BRIGHT VIOLET HAIR!!!! And I swear it wasnt that colour a few days ago! And to top it all off, she got more compliments from people at the craft fair about how lovely her hair colour was that I was actually starting to think that I must be colour blind and seeing some other daft colour from everyone else!
While the socca bakes and you caramelize the onions, this would be a good time to make your sauce (see recipe below).
I gathered in such seemingly unconnected elements such as clear quartz points, rat bones, bubblewrap, plastic door bead strings, Czech beads, tribal drops, sea glass, vintage lingerie fittings and art deco jewellery. I also made a list of things I wanted to have on hand but as yet did not- white chain, obsolete computer components, square beads and a home enamelling kit - the kind used for bathtub repair. Even the things I'd bought from Etsy that arrived that day fit perfectly into the scheme, even though when I bought them it was with Faginpunk very clearly in mind.
(a) often fidgets with hands or feet in meetings, Safeway grocery line, stirrups due to being struck with perfect blog idea
Among the praises I could heap up about John, probably the one that gets closest to the heart of his excellence would be this: In the art of stating deep mysteries with economy and directness, he has no peer. For example:
Our book is an expansion of this dissertation, both in terms of the breadth of the corpus of quotations in vol. 2 and in terms of the “philological and linguistic discussions,” in vol. 1. Tirosh-Becker discusses such questions as the ways in which Karaite scholars treated rabbinic material, whether or not they forged it for their own purposes (usually not, but there is one fake barayta forged by Sahel b. Masliah, mentioned on p. 106-107), and what they called it when they quoted it (usually, “the first ones said”, qâl âlâwalûn). She also devotes an extensive chapter to the question of the script employed in Karaite works: Karaite writers used both Hebrew and Arabic scripts, and wrote both languages in both scripts. This is of importance to the linguist, as many rabbinic sources are transliterated into Arabic script, allowing for the reconstruction of the reading tradition of certain words (e.g.: the reading ribbi is attested, as in all other rabbinic sources – and not rabbi; the letter ג is transliterated as jim and as ghain, depending on its positon in the word: gevul but reghilim).
Yet as is often the case, I was proven completely wrong: both flights and every night save one were surprisingly uneventful, even pleasant. I was able to imbibe and read much more than I had thought possible (in other words, more than none). I finished two books over the eight days in Paris: Tony Judt’s The Memory Chalet and Scott Fitzgerald’s On Booze. Reading these books – especially while traveling with my family – provoked a bit of introspection into my own life since first visiting Paris in 2002.
8) If the National Feedlot project is a national project, then why is it allegedly supplying meat to fancy restaurants owned by Shahrizat’s family?
My buddy Leslie (different than our former favorite blog buddy Leslie) and I met up with Tracey and her cousin, Dawn at 9am when the doors opened. I've never ever gone or done Black Friday before b/c it's just not my bag. But 9am and cheap shoes? That I can handle. Most of the run on shoes seemed to be for mens and kids shoes. It wasn't nearly as crowded as one might expect so it was good. I picked up these for $4 (that's right, $4). They retailed for $42 and are actually kids shoes. They're a size 6 in girls which fits my 7/7.5 feet perfectly. I also snagged some Hunter wellies that I'll post soon!
In a 5 quart bowl or a large pot mix the warm water, yeast and salt. In a large bowl mix together the all-purpose and whole wheat flours. Add this to the water mixture. Using a wooden spoon mix until everything is incorporated. Cover (not airtight) and let sit for 2-5 hours at room temperature until it collapses or flattens on top. Sprinkle the top with 1/4 cup whole wheat flour. Break off a 1 lb piece (about the size of a grapefruit). I just cut mine into approximately 4 equal pieces and then pull out a piece. I separately store the remaining 3 pieces in individual Ziploc bags.
Armor: 2 point skin
In the UK, it was viewed as a ‘hate crime’ and the BBC reported it as “an act deeply offensive to Sikhs because of the religious importance of their hair”.
Nothing more than love.
one long and
And this? This, in a nutshell, is how I have survived 4 days as a stay at home mum.
But something keeps pulling me back
She asked me for a cushion with a horse on it, in light blue or light pink. She loved it, and as she’s such a sweet girl, it gave me a lot of pleasure to make it for her. Sadly as you will see from the creases, my ironing board was hidden away in the kitchen, right where the builders were working (that’s my excuse anyway!) but she didn’t even mind the creases.
Sul Kraft ho stampato in bianco un bellissimo timbro in legno della Hero Arts.
Crime Stoppers
All of us have our own “narratives” about God as the author relates in his book. For most of us, the narratives that we have in our minds about God are false. For example, one false narrative that many people believe is the “cultural narrative of earning” that is carried over into our spiritual lives…that somehow we need to work harder, and just be better to “earn” favor with God. As the author emphatically states in his book, this narrative IS false. The true narrative is the one that Jesus would want us to know; I mean, really wrap our minds and hearts around, and that is that we cannot earn favor with God. It is humanly impossible. We can never be good enough or do enough to merit the favor of a holy and righteous God. As the author shares, the God that Jesus wants us to know and love has provided us a way to gain his complete and unconditional favor, and that way is through having faith in his son Jesus Christ….Nothing more and nothing less. Now, the
It has been a big week.
Ginger - 1/2 - 3/4 inch piece
What made you decide to sell on etsy? Do you sell anywhere else?
Amy Ferris is author, editor, screenwriter and playwright. Her successful memoir, Marrying George Clooney, Confessions From a Midlife Crisis recently had a run as an off-Broadway play at CAP21 Theatre in NYC. She also co-wrote the movies Funny Valentines and Mr. Wonderful. Amy is on the Advisory Board of The Women’s Media Center, is on faculty at The San Miguel de Allende Writers Conference and is a visiting teacher at the UCLA Writers Workshop (extension), among other things.
One of the things that amazes me like nothing else living in South Florida is the rate of change. A hundred years ago almost exactly, this entire area was accessible only by boat. Then came the famous Henry Flagler and his railroad. His achievements have been referenced several times in this blog and here once again I found a bit of his legacy. The railroad bridge may look like it's 100 years old but trains still pass over it.
Southern California does not only boast world-class beer bars, but also some of the best beer shops around.
I have had a hectic few weeks,first having to go to England for a week to take hubby to see his brother who is unfortunately very ill,then when I got back I only had couple of days and I took off on my own to America and have only been home for three days.
Diana Kennedy's Carnitas - Before there was Bobby Flay or Rick Bayless, Diana Kennedy taught my mother's generation what Mexican food was all about. Her recipes are clearly written and deceptively simple. These carnitas are amazing - we glazed them with a bit of lime and brown sugar, served them at our holiday party, and watched them disappear.
So my plans to get back to blogging have been interruped by dental drama.
one called Rosa, the other Juana,
“Last night my wife died as a result of being unable to swallow newspaper and turnip rinds thanks to a perfectly understandable shortage of water in our apartment which I’m assured the state water company will have fixed by 2013. I blame her choking to death on the West Germans and NOT the Democratic Republic,” says Stemplhöff Bratwurst, a research scientist at the East German Girls’ Swimming, Gymnastics And Steroid Research Facility. “I have made this statement of my own free will.”
Stamps: A Real Wild Poppy by Hero Arts, sentiment from Teeny Tiny Wishes by SU!, inside sentiment by Papertrey Ink
Well, christmas and new year is over. Back to normal.
Held at The Writer’s Center: 4508 Walsh Street, Bethesda, MD 20815. There is ample parking across the street (free on weekends), and the theatre is just blocks away from the Bethesda Metro Station on the red line.
These Indian pancakes are not like the ones we typically think of in North America or in most of the Western world for that matter. Here we think of cake-like little rounds served with some maple syrup and butter. Delicious for sure, but Indian pancakes are a different and savory experience altogether, as often made with whole rice grains or dals as with flour. I so adore Indian pancakes — great for breakfast, brunch or dinner, or even as a snack. Rather like thick crêpes, this recipe was inspired by 1,000 Indian Recipes by Neelam Batra. Another must for your bookshelf. How can you go wrong with 1,000 offerings that will please anyone who enjoys Indian cooking with suggestions for any meal of the day? As noted in previous posts, this book is not strictly vegetarian, but I bet you can imagine just how many of the recipes are vegetarian, and how many others are easily adaptable to suit a meat-free diet. I have no affiliation with the author, but I continue to promote a book that has proved such a staple for ideas and information. Spread the word and keep the marketplace free and informed.
96. Time is not a line but a dimension, like the dimensions of space. —Margaret Atwood, Cat's Eye (1988)
Then there was Christmas. Our house is cozy and you can still barely walk through it despite having moved many toys out of the living room and to the basement playroom. But there is no doubt in my mind that my kiddos are loved (by us, by family, by Santa).
Of everything alas! save thee.
Doubt is essentially an actor’s film. There’s not too much to it apart from the script and the three central roles – all of which are played beautifully by Meryl Streep, Philip Seymour Hoffman, and Amy Adams. It’s obvious that this is a stage adaptation, and unfortunately writer/director John Patrick Shanley, in his first directorial project in nearly 20 years (the only other film Shanley has helmed was Joe Versus the Volcano), does not have the skills to push the look of the film past inherent staginess. There are a lot of awkward, heavy-handed shots (don’t let me get into how much I dislike the off-kilter camera), which unfortunately highlight some of the more overbearing aspects of the script – though, due mostly to the topics the film deals with, some weightiness can be forgiven.
To the heart of the matter, then, is a Federal Concealed Carry Reciprocity law acceptable to upholders of the Founding Principles?
Another sacred cow of Healthism has been slaughtered with the news that scientists have discovered that the magic “five a day” portions of fruit and veg won’t in practice do much if anything to reduce the risk of cancer. A massive study covering over 500,000 people has shown that the reduction in risk is a mere 2.5%, which falls well short of being statistically significant.
If using the rolled pie dough found in the refrigerator section of your grocery store, roll out the dough into the pie dish. If using a frozen pie shell, bring to room temperature.
What the f*ck are these people trying to say?
Multi-Tasking
It also highlights what so many of us parents have seen but not so many doctors acknowledge: autism, in a high percentage of kids, includes a list of medical issues that are frequently treated as ‘just a coincidence,’ unrelated to autism, yet so many of our kids experience. When BB was young, he was a medical puzzle. Chronic diarrhea. Years later, encopresis and constipation. Skin rashes. Frequent ear infections. Swollen lymph nodes. Reflux. Food intolerances. The list goes on. The first 15 pages alone of this book sucked me in, and I had my husband sitting down to read it. (And this is a guy who doesn’t want to sit and read books — he’ll be the first to tell you, read this book.)
One day in the cafeteria, the queen bee bully pulls me by my necklace, a Jewish star, and tells me to throw her lunch away. I tell her no.
I have also made a sneaky little request to Jo to draw it.
This trash company will pick up ONE trash can full of trash. (And one full of recycling.)
2)I am on a world-convention in India. We are there to be helped by enlightened teachers to wake up and choose God. I watch one of them levitate: he shoots up in the air – he certainly does not believe himself being a body! Then he descends graciously, sitting in lotus-position, and sinks into a little pool of water before he ascends, shaking the water from his head.
This whole situation may seem extremely foreign and crazy to many of you reading this (as it is for me), but this is what is normal and accepted here. Fatima-Zahra has repeated many times that this is Moroccan tradition and culture. Not every marriage happens in this way anymore, mostly in the more rural areas or within traditional families. It helps me knowing that Fatima-Zahra wants this and it is fully her decision to get married to Rashid. She and many of my other young female host cousins in my first host family have expressed to me how foreign and crazy it is that people in the United States date (and sleep with) many different people before marriage. They find it impure and shameful. These conversations and the Moroccan engagements I have witnessed so far are reminders that I am living in a culture where the smallest unit of society is not the individual, rather it is the family.
My father
Lord of Hosts,
Mention fame and he gets perplexed, on one hand he is in the regular line-up of one of Britians biggest bands and thinks nothing of it on another he wants to propel Boy Cried Wolf and become “one of those true music heroes.” The beauty of contradiction exudes brightly from Murray in a way which makes sense. He displays the perfect balance of nonchalance without being aloof and ambition, without being fame hungry. It is the industry’s obsession with fame and get rich quick schemes that exasperate him the most. “Fame is so undeserved these days the people I look up to who are real stars are; David Bowie, Brian Ferry even Pete Doherty. Peter Doherty is in a band called the Libertines and he is a true libertine, he doesn’t give a fuck. We could do with more people like that, not crack-heads but people who are completely immersed in music and in their idea of who they are. If you want to be in a band then it’s got to be your entire life, it has to be your last thought when you go to bed and your first thought when you wake up.”
According to officials on the scene either part or all of Zwelithini's remaining cavalcade returned to the scene. It is unclear if Zwelithini did too.
1 cup snap peas
And while it must immediately be conceded that no mention is made of actual sexual activity between these people, it must also be pointed out that these couples had therefore made covenants with each other. And to the ancient Israelites, a covenant was viewed as a holy bond; a powerful uniting of two people.
5. Soldado (Valencia): Age: 26 Gls: 17 – WGR: 1.26
Finally, the problems with abuse/stalking victims was not realized until after SB18 was passed. I’m not sure protections for them can be added in at this time. If so, some effort needs to be made to protect more than just date of birth for these victims. Better yet: why not just let voters opt in to have their information released.
I painted them with acrylic craft paint and did a lot of the details with waterproof markers, then finished them with a coat of matte Mod Podge. I learned a lot doing these and would definitely do some things differently next time (like waiting for the paint or mod podge on the heads to dry completely before picking them up -- I had to redo a few things because I was so impatient).
I repeat the above step several times over the different areas of the image. I suggest coloring large circles on a scrap piece of paper with your Copics, and play around with different cloths, socks etc.
Sprawling but concise, ambitious but accessible, We're All Dying to Live is a sunburst tapestry of light and color that serves as both an excellent dance record and the perfect salve for a broken heart. The sense of discovery is profound: melodies both familiar and instantly memorable, drawn from a clear lineage of post-Mangum grandeur, sweep into anthemic choruses consisting of simple but resonant pop mantras: remember what we've been given; we won't leave it all in our heads; we are not dead. The cumulative effect evokes nothing less than the quaking, shuddering majesty of a sunrise seen from orbit, filtered through a lens of half-remembered childhood dreams and multiplied by the sweet agony of your first lost love. Rich Aucoin is precisely the unifying force that this generation needs; at long last, the dance floor shaman we've all been waiting for.
This is the time for all Australians to don the green and gold, download like bandits and make it infiltrate the top ten while the Americans are sleeping.
A Mail on Sunday investigation has uncovered details of his lavish expenses during his last term of office from documents published recently by the Greater London Authority, in addition to secret receipts.
The collections closes with four post WWII stories. I plan to post on them during Irish Short Stories Week.
I specifically remember doing these "business ventures" with one of two childhood friends...Alice or Rosemarie. Here I am with Rosemarie and my brother, Michael. (I'm the one in the blue shirt.)
Asked if China should be alarmed, U.S. Marine Lt. Col. Curtis Hill said in a news conference that the exercises would not focus on any nation as an adversary.
Final Price:$2.25 after coupon
So glad I caught this evening's sky.
His answers had us all crackin up! :)
Sometimes might knock me down
This phenomenon is nothing new or by any means specific to the Rap genre, for example Ex-Take That Robbie Williams recently admitted that he is a Conspiracy Theory buff, and has added an Eye of Ra and Question mark symbol to his logo not unlike Prince's Ankh like Symbol.
I DO "get you" ... dont you FEEL that???....and if you work hard at keeping me at a distance I wont try to stop you.......and these are the kinds of things that once they get ruined they dont get fixed.....
“And it´s so different for a lot of people I´ve known. One partner doesn´t love the other enough to stop drinking, or gambling, or running around with other women. One is the giver and one is the taker. The giver wishes the taker would stop.”
One more thing. Laurie's birthday was in May and I had planned to make and send her a card. But, life got in the way and it took me forever to find some crafting time. I ended up CASEing a card by Vanessa Menhorn that I saw in the latest volume of Card Creations magazine. I used Laurie's favorite color combination: Pure Poppy, Kraft, and Black. I never mailed the card because it was so late.
I once had a friend who questioned her own judgement and it led to fear and paralysis of action in the greater schema of her life. The incident that I recall clearly is when we were ordering lunch. Once she placed her order, she questioned herself and regretted not ordering another item. I had reminded her this was one meal. There would be another meal in a few hours. Not every decision is critical to warrant the worries and stress.
For instance (and this is just a random observation), the week Bob Marley died, three of the four – what we called, inkies (the weekly music papers) – changed their planned front covers to portraits of Bob.
Better leadership. Better effort. Better results. The times are indeed a-changin’ for the Mets, and for the first time in years, that change is producing positive energy and positive results. Change is good.
but deep down inside,
Great Giver, we bless You, for giving us life in this month and we pray Thee to connect us with all we need to dwell in good health throughout this month and we adore You for nourishing our Spirits, souls and bodies through Your abundance, Father, we are most greatful for in Jesus Name, we worship. Amen, Amen and Amen.
Jack has even cycled home with 4 unassembled dining room chairs, all boxed up on the bike trailer from the furniture store. It was only a 6 km. trip, partially on a busy road, then onto the bike path. But it is possible with all the right roping, bungie cords and knowing the bike route well enough in advance to maneouvre the trailing, oversized packages along. Another time, he slowly transported a pair of skis.
Then you have the Intercontinental Title, and again, the belt isn’t the significant part of this current reign so much as the person holding it. Paul Wright: the Big Show. Latest Grand Slam Champion. Why is this big? Not only because only a select few have been Grand Slam Champions, but because only a handful can be Grand Slam Champions in the WWE at this point, and the list may shock you*.
Me: "Joe Braden, I am just curious, exactly what did you do the one time you got in trouble this year?"
363 **5. “On Being an Opportunist,” The Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, October 2, 2003, p. 8. (Source: Item D-XI/10/2000, below.)
Miles opened the door wide and led me to a fairly large room with a bar in one end and gestured for me to have a seat by the coffee table in a cozy corner at the other end. "I hope you didn't have lunch," he said in that low, raspy voice of his. Lunch? that was certainly unexpected. "No," I replied, placing my recorder on the table and noticing that Miles seemed to eye it with a hint of curiosity. It was not until several days later that Teo Macero, his producer, informed me that Miles did not like to be interviewed on tape. It's a good thing that I didn't know that earlier. At the first Ida Cox session, ten years earlier, I had watched admiringly as Whitney Balliett took notes in what seemed to be shorthand and got every word and breath right. With Miles, a tape recorder was an absolute necessity, and not only did he not balk at seeing it, there were a couple of occasions when he walked over to the bar and carried my recorder with him so that I wouldn't miss a word.
After that we have a shorter camping trip planned with the Landis's (who we regrettably see little of now days due to them living in Fallbrook, and Jennifer's crazy pharmacist schedule), and our BIG camping trip planned with Nathan & Melinda to the Grand Canyon and Zion in August.
He signed and dated it, and gave it back to her half-heartedly.
I will do this.
Jason Mraz’s new album is streaming through youtube. I’m holding five conversations at once. One with a friend from college through facebook, one with my best friend in Georgia through texting, one with you dear reader, one with Jason Mraz, and one with God.
Of course, I had to bring out the Cricut and create a little banner for the table! For this, I used Mini Monograms. I cut out the foundation and the letters (using the circle, dots, stitches, and frame features) at 4 inches with white cardstock for the base, and I used red patterned paper and plain blue cardstock from my stash. So simple and very easy to create.
Someday I'd like to go back and do some more exploring around the Superstition Mountains. Maybe make that an all day type of thing instead of a drive by. Might be a great place to bring some visitors at the same time. I put it on the agenda for February.
The community of believers devoted themselves to a way of life that centered around table practices where relationships transcended social and economic categories. In fact, the practiced economic sharing so that the needs of all in the community were met. I wonder what devotion might look like for us.
Haley called me one day and asked me if I had any crafts I wanted her to make for the party because she was bored. I hadn't really planned any crafts, but I said if she really wanted it would be fun to have a banner. Man she came up with a doozy! She made the most adorable banner!
4 An Old Man Smiled 8:20
Are there any Dalits anchoring a programme or going regularly to camera on a major Indian television channel? My contacts tell me there aren’t. It will be a big moment when that changes — and a daunting burden on the person who breaks that barrier.
So when I am weary'd with wand'ring all day,
Then, and only then, did we leave death alone.
20) Frantzén/Lindeberg (Stockholm, Sweden)
Glitter cardstock-not sure brand got it at J's in single sheet
Welcome back to another challenge in The Cafe.
The two key points: Overload. If you do not stress the muscle beyond its usual capabilities, then you get no damage. Second point: Rest. Muscle does not get bigger or stronger during exercise, this is the damaging stage. Hence if you don’t rest, your muscles won’t grow.
Although the need to release could be perceived as funny, Mike was always discreet about his private time because he knew deep down it was better to be the teller of a joke than the subject of one.
Now, if you want to see some real bloomers, visit our hostess Carol at May Dreams Gardens and see the list of this month's Garden Blogger Bloom Day's participants. Those gardens are sure to have some blossoms for you.
I'm calling this challenge 30/30/30 since it's 30 pages made in 30 minutes over 30 days.
studded gloves
around
Checked on her this morning when I fed, she was fine and ate her breakfast, she had pooped a couple more times. Still hadnt drank more than a little water. She seems good this afternoon.
We are over half way through our trip, there is still so much that we want to see, particularly Adam who is loving all the history around him. But the thought of taking our kids out in public again makes me want to kill myself. So tomorrow, we are going to attempt to separate them. Adam is going to do some stuff in London with Xavier that I don't want to see, and Stella and I will find something to do somewhere. I have no idea what yet. There is a big Westfield nearby, maybe we will head there, in the warm and try to have some mumma girlie bonding time.
renovated all general
So we're drivin and I'm like
Do any of you photographers out there have any good advice on stock photography?
For the uninitiated, music is quite literally the heart and soul of BIT.TRIP’s charm and appeal. In BIT.TRIP Runner, for example, the main premise of the game is to jump, kick and slide under obstacles as CommanderVideo runs automatically across the stage. It sounds simple, but every obstacle has been expertly placed like a note on a sheet of music. Jump and another beat joins the musical fray; slide and a quaver triplet dances out of your speakers. Every press of a button is designed to create one more note in the game’s glorious chiptune symphony, and the more gold and bonuses you collect along the way, the more the music grows until it’s a full body of sound with layer upon layer of sheer aural delight. One wrong move though and it’s back to the beginning, and the music regresses back to its original, simple tune.
Trish herself is trying to run away from traumatic memories of her husband, the aforementioned Bill Maplewood, with the help of a new boyfriend, Harvey (Michael Lerner), who, she says to him with delight, is "so...normal!" And Helen—who, tellingly, takes up far less screen time than Trish or Joy—has fled the difficulties of becoming a successful writer to sell out to Hollywood luxury as a screenwriter. (Helen's anguished speech in which she lashes out against how hard it is on her that people find her "cruel and condescending"—dialogue which recalls Solondz's self-defensive posture in his 2001 film Storytelling—is the one unfortunate moment that recalls Solondz's old Happiness-style contempt.)
The place is so modern, so new, so oddly located, so shiny and so deeply design-daahling, it’s the antithesis of your prototypical Paris hotel.
Everything probably would have been alright if we'd left the calf where she landed, but it was still a pretty steep spot, so My Man went in and picked her up and brought her down to level ground where it would be much easier for the calf to find its legs when the time came.
Although it seems like you’ll be able to remember everything, unless you keep a diary or log of your activities and learning, you will probably forget valuable information that you need for your final report. Keeping note of important dates such as when you started and finished your placement will also help you with job applications after you graduate.
And on, and on, and on it will go senselessly for several pages. When you actually finish reading those pages, if you still weren’t brain-dead, it will occur to you that the flippin’ name that was asked, hasn’t been mentioned at all. No kidding!
The talk of refugees panicked him. It made him think he was in some third world country. It was certainly a sharp contrast to the urban life he was living a half day before.
I spent an hour or two looking up recipes in my various fish cookery books, and decided on a Jane Grigson recipe, I do find her recipes very reliable. However, along with all my other books there were no instructions on how to remove the abalone from their shells.
The graph below I found interesting. It shows the contribution of each component to real GDP growth for each quarter. The latest data point (which is still an early estimate) shows a very minor contribution by fixed investment. Also, the government’s contribution is still dragging growth. If I’m reading this correctly, it looks as though 2012Q1′s net real GDP growth was driven by consumption. Hopefully, the numbers will be revised up.
As part of its rapid urbanization efforts, China has spent billions of dollars over the past decade on building huge subway systems and a national high-speed rail network.
Irresistible Grace
Additionally, this series of Scriptures tells us to “pray continually, and give thanks in all circumstances” How can we give thanks with a truly grateful heart when we are in the middle of enduring a struggle? As difficult as it may be, we can. We can find something to be joyful about, we can find something in our day to help us rejoice. One of my favorite things to do when I am down and out at work is to sing “Amazing Grace…how sweet the sound…that saved a wretch like me. I one was lost, but now am found, was blind but now I see…” I rejoice even in the times that I am financially destitute, because I know that the Lord has a reason that I am where I am. He has humbled me before, and does more and more every single day. Why would today be any different than yesterday…and the day after tomorrow any different from tomorrow?
So here I go. A devilfish is the first step. I don’t usually like movable parts in my models, but damnit this thing is just beautiful. The parts you see here, minus the gun droids and the tank commanders, will be painted separately. I’ll do the interior, and yes, I will leave the hatch, rear door, front machine gun and engines movable. Don’t know why. Maybe cause I can, and I want to point them in different directions during my games. They are that gorgeous. Let’s see if I can come up with a nice color scheme based on the already painted Drans.
Minimize your own vocals (in video and audio interviews). Ask questions clearly and succinctly, then let the person speak without any more words from you. Learn to react silently as the subject talks — rather than saying things like “uh-huh, right, I see”, use nods and facial expressions.
They’ve protected b(w)ankers by mortgaging taxpayers for the next fifty years by bailing out the banks (OK Labour has to take some of this blame) but they have done nothing substantial to quell the big business, large bonus attitude of the city of London or in banking establishments. Why? Because they are all in bed together, they are mates, or they are getting paid well as advisors by these people. Wow, democracy in action. Fairness and equality for everyone? No wonder they hate socialism, the idea that they share some of this wealth with the rest of us makes them sick, it’s there money NOT YOURS! I know slavery was outlawed many, many years ago but the poor and the working classes are still stuck in a slavery like poverty trap where they do the lowest paid jobs (and pay the taxes) and are told to be grateful and it’s these people who own the majority of British wealth that engineer society to be that way. It stinks.
Because I have never had a day off from motherly duties…
GrtaylI N. Are female health workers an obstetrical risk group? Hekim Forumu 1991; lO(64): 31.
I'm stitching my motifs right side up, like the houses,
The priest in this case, Father Shawn Ratigan, has been charged with 13 counts of child pornography, some of which he kept on a church computer, and is jailed awaiting trial.
11/16 – The Waterfront – Holyoke, MA
Once its mixed up, you need to let it dry. I'm incredibly lazy and impatient, so I tend to put mine in front of a space heater I keep in my studio specifically for drying stuff.
Dr. Gabriella Mondini, a strong-willed, young Venetian woman, has followed her father in the path of medicine. She possesses a singleminded passion for the art of physick, even though, in 1590, the male-dominated establishment is reluctant to accept a woman doctor. ...
So before booking a ceremony and reception site think carefully about what will work for you and your guests. And one more thing: Even though Super Bowl Sunday is on a weekend, you shouldn’t pick it as your wedding date, unless you don’t mind that more than half of your guests will be running to the bar to catch the game.
Todd and I were just new Christians when we sat in church one Sunday- Missions Sunday to be exact. Being a newer Christian I really didn’t know a lot about missions- and it intrigued me. I was completely engrossed in every word. During one of their short video clips they told of a missionary couple in China- and vaguely mentioned the couple was taking care of an abandoned little girl in their home... then on they went telling of their missions work. End of story.
We got filthy! But it was fun, and adventurous, and a nice break from the hot sun that Robb claimed he was allergic too ;)
Yet a closer look at what passes for scholarship among the Group also revealed some zany (to borrow an adjective from the current presidential campaign) assertions—such as Grant Farred’s claim that former Houston Rockets center Yao Ming represented “the most profound threat to American empire.”
I first read about this one on another beer blog – the name of which escapes me now. I stumbled upon it at the local Total Wine outlet and bought a bottle for the recent trip to Sierra Vista, but, having sampled so much (perhaps too much) of the local Tucson beers, the bottle of Torpedo stayed in the cooler and came back to Beer Rant HQ with me for sampling a few days later.
All in all, a nice meal in a classic joint, with a fab deal that we wouldn't have been able to afford outside of dineLA.
Mission Implausible...Saturday and Sunday at 6pm (and +1) PICK TV.
We have also been working on an order for fiberglass repair material out of New Zealand. We have the order mostly complete, but it will take 2-3 weeks to arrive from NZ. We have an experienced fiberglasser lined up to do the repairs when the supplies arrive.
The same can be said of its foreign policy as years of multicultural dogma and complacent cultural accommodations has redefined the Canadian into being an empty shell of a human; as nothing more than someone who posses some vague "shared values" that no one can agree on, has a job, and regularly shops in a mall; that a Canadian is just someone who resides in Canada while one's cultural and and emotional attachments reside somewhere else. With a nation full of these people it will be difficult to have an effective foreign policy without giving consideration to the sensibilities of some voting bloc.
We can see anything that’s close enough.
A lot of the dialoge in the film is lifted from the book, and I think one of my favourite quotes is Dexter to Emma:
Maybe you're reason why all the doors are closed
Please put in the subject field of your email your placing and the challenge number - this will make Nikky's life a lot easier!
In the 18 months I've been traversing the blogging world, one unexpected delight has been meeting and making friends with talented writers, artists and the most fascinating creative people. D. Smith Kaich Jones of Emma Tree: Tales of Art and Anxiety is one of those folks. Debi writes of experiences of daily life and describes them in such a rich and exquisite way that you can't help but connect and get what she says as well as feel understood, yourself. I stop there for a visit when I need to refill my inspirational cup.
send a few broken-down APCs to
What if I said to you that the title is wrong
A few years ago at the Seattle Special Olympics, nine contestants, all physically or mentally disabled, assembled at the starting line for the 100-yard dash. At the gun they all started out, not exactly in a dash, but with the relish to run the race to the finish and win. All, that is, except one boy who stumbled on the asphalt, tumbled over a couple of times, and began to cry. The other eight heard the boy cry. They slowed down and paused. Then they all turned around and went back. Every one of them. One girl with Down syndrome bent down and kissed him and said, “This will make it better.” Then all nine linked arms and walked together to the finish line. Everyone in the stadium stood, and the cheering went on for 10 minutes.
Lasting impressions: This book could actually happen. Which is definitely equal parts scary and awesome (as a reading experience, not as life).
I am working on another book another volume of Simply Delicious
It would be good not only for elemental justice but for Iraq and its future if a large force of coalition troops led by U.S. Marines would go into Fallujah, find the young men, arrest them or kill them, and, to make sure the point isn’t lost on them, blow up the bridge.
I finished my study of Esther last week. It was very good. I highly recommend Beth Moore's Bible Studies. She speaks to the heart of women. You will grow and learn, that's for sure.
We had our differences, but John first showed me his true colors as a brother, as a brother who said, “Yes, I am brother’s keeper,” when, as teenagers, one night a good friend of mine and I had – let’s just say “some people over.” My parents were out, and the people were over, then they left, and my parents came home; I was sleeping. The lights came on in my room and my father wanted to know what this earring was he’d found on the floor. And John, who was then a senior in high school and had a little more gravitas, blithely said, “Oh, I had so-and-so over and she must’ve left it here.” –I don’t know if you knew that, Dad, but—
Who are they going to send in to fight PTSD? Who are they going to send in to protect the loved ones cum enemies living with the warriors who fought an enemy that spent so much of his time hiding behind cell phones, the walls of family homes, bags of “trash”, women, children, and mountain ranges? What special forces team are they going to deploy to seek out the PTSD monster, find it in its cave and eliminate it? What plan do they have in place to effectively deal with the war that is now being waged in the heads and homes of warriors, some of which have no scars that we can point at to make sense of what in God’s name is going on?
Happy Thursday and thank you for responding to my "followers" post.
Waking refreshed we showered and changed and made our way down to the restaurant for another delicious dinner and then enjoyed the entertainment in one of the many bars.
But, aside from that, making it to a year has been liberating. I've stopped pumping all day, every day. I still use the SNS, and I give her organic whole (cow's) milk. That, in itself, relieves so much stress. No more worrying about her not finishing that milk I worked so hard to get. She's still nursing as much as ever.
The woman who shared this interesting concept with me had an example to show me. Unfortunately, I didn't have my camera with me that day to photograph an actual Circle Letter. She comes from a large family and in order to keep in touch with her siblings, they use the Circle Letter as a personal and effective way to communicate. Rather than writing out a separate letter to each person, they simply write one letter and send it to the person next on the list who adds their letter (after reading the ones inside) and mails it on to the next in line. The list of names/addresses is contained in the envelope so you always know. Eventually the packet of letters grows larger and returns to the initial person on the list. They catch up on all of the news that has been shared since they first sent their letter weeks earlier and then they take out that original letter and add a new one. Round and round it goes. Brilliant.
Image by Max Melville… Florence
Meet the 'family': Lucia, Hazel, Jeanette, Laura, Jonny and Karen, with Charles Manson at the back;
Art Direction: Carl J. Weyl
I love to read YA Paranormal stories (if you haven't figured that out yet, lol). Lucky for me, the ebook world seems to be jammed packed with fantastic, young adult, paranormal writers. My new goal for my blog is to feature a new and wonderful read by YA indie paranormal authors that I love each week. Some of these authors I have have never met, some I have had to pleasure to chat with on the internet and some I have had the pleasure to meet in person.
Reservations and Ticketing:
Here I am, putting the finishing touches on a proof for a customer. Charlotte crawled into my lap whining, "I wanna hold you, Mama." She then promptly rested her head on my arm as I used the mouse and drifted off to sleep. I snapped a quick picture because I often face the question, "How DO you do it?" Well, folks, this is how I do it. Pretty glamourous, huh?
I'm having a particularly lazy Saturday today and I didn't want to ruin it by doing anything productive, but I still wanted to accomplish something. That's when I decided to finally change out of my pajamas and pull on some jeans. That oughta do it!
And there was the plot. All because of one different perspective on vampires.
For the first time, we aren't plagued by the black spot on the rose leaves. But the trade-off is that the roses bloom and quickly brown and shrivel. They come apart like an explosion of confetti when you touch them. Last Thursday, when I was at Jane Austen's House, every gust of wind blew a shower of rose petals through the front door. I kept looking for the phantom June wedding.
The British knew how to run an empire. Take the natives by surprise using superior firepower. Enlist local elites to help you subdue and run the place. And, above all, send a significant crew of Brits to live and work in the conquered territory. Learn the local languages and customs and endeavor to understand thoroughly those whom you've conquered.
He read the third; a chuckling noise
Probably settled in the suburbs, living some sort of packaged dream from straight out of the catalogue?
Bad timing, then, to start in on a bowl of homemade potato chips, each the size of my face. Thankfully the chips weren't mercilessly salty like the shishitos, but they didn't help the cause either. With the chips were three very inspired dipping concoctions: smooth guacamole, vanilla bean-enhanced tomato ketchup and spicy blood orange and habanero ketchup. They all worked despite my skepticism of the vanilla ketchup. Wouldn't want a lot of the stuff but as a counterpoint to the others, I really liked it.
I didn’t make eye contact by marking work
Well, after two weeks of 70 degree weather, I guess it's safe to say that Spring is actually here! To celebrate and add a little Spring color (and also as my entry for the Jinger Adams design team!), I made this birdhouse using some Echo Park and Doodlebug papers and a little bit of Cricut.
"And he stomped off. Evaporated, as he used to put it. The reproof had been as annihilating as any I ever heard administered."
I had Geej's parent/teacher conference on Thursday afternoon. Let me set the scene for you:
elegantly explained by Alexander R. Galloway in “What is a Hermeneutic Light?,” Leper Creativity: Cyclonopedia Symposium, eds. Ed Keller, Nicola Masciandaro, and Eugene Thacker (New York: punctum books, 2012), 159-72.
Satya Trauma & Maternity Centre,Barra, Kanpur &
For any of you who know Cambria personally, you probably would agree with me that she has ADD (Attention Deffest Disorder). Now, I know this disorder is a very common term now days and I think a lot of kids are diagnosed and treated unnecessarily. I think putting a young child on medication that alters their personality (unless of course it is necessary for their, yours, or a siblings safety) is very upsetting. As a parent, I think it is our job to find ways or solutions to help our kids better understand their abilities and how to use them instead of just masking the problem with a medication.
So, I don't know what to do at this point, I'm sleepy and forgetting what I was saying.
that appealed to my sense of humour, sending tapes back and
It is designed to fit the content you provide and the preferences you have.
Dyanne Thorne started out on the theater stage at a very early age. As a young women, she studied religion and anthropology at the university level before her singing and acting career blossomed and sent her heading toward California. Once arriving, Dyanne would continue performing on stage while she landed walk on roles in classic 1960′s television shows like STAR TREK and FELONY SQUAD. In addition, she would work on the stage in Las Vegas while occasionally taking on film roles in low budget fair like, LOVE ME LIKE YOU DO (1968), POINT OF TERROR (1971) and BLOOD SABBATH (1972).
Only many years later did Basil Sampson, a former editor of Drum, disclose that the speech was in fact a carefully contrived document which he himself edited and polished at the request of Mandela's counsel, Bram Fischer, an Afrikaner and probably the most fanatical communist ideologue this country has ever known.
7 rather
teacher took it off and we switched around holding it. It was
And then we got off with the car and went back to the Crown and Anchor….this time, there was no emotional tension…only sexual tension! We would have drinks, I’d gently rub his back, we would talk and sometimes kiss each other in between talking – I made sure I always sat very close to him. We’d walk hand in hand down Bourbon Street at night, watching people mis-behave. Once, we were walking and he said something to me and I didn’t hear him. I said, “Babe – I didn’t hear you – what did you say?” And he said, “Oh, never mind – I don’t want to be disrespectful.” I laughed at this and said, “Are you serious? You just disrespected me in at least 5 different ways back at the house when you were f*cking me – we are WAY past polite, come on!” He laughed and said, “You’re right.” There were some moments that we experienced together that are so precious and that no one can take away…it feels good to have them; he gave me many moments like that.
What was your favorite book during the middle grade years? High school years? Why did these appeal to you and how are they different from said age literature today?
Hearing His promise “Never will I leave you, never will I forsake you.” Hebrews 13: 5
you can smash an play
BARACK: What the hell! Who’s there? I – I warn you, the Secret Service is right outside that door, and they are authorized to use deadly force!
They are both clear and uncompromising in their opinions and in their prose, although I would say that Giordano is a bit more of the elder statesman, while Broder is the in-your-face warrior. They are unsurprisingly in agreement about Recep Tayyip Erdogan and Gerhard Schröder, as about many other things.
I haven’t read a ton of blogs but I am trying to see what is out there. I am fearful it will change how I write my stories that I want to give my kids one day. The whole reason I started writing was so that they would know who I was at this moment and how I interpreted our family. It’s a legal thing in case they decide to sue me when they grow up (and because my own mom died at 39 before she had a chance for me to know who she was. Now that I am her age I think often how she really was just doing the best she could with her circumstances. I am still pissed at her though.) I am already planning to counter sue my boys for refusing to exit my uterus thus destroying my belly button and turning it into a cup holder. You all may get subpoenaed. I’m kidding. I’m kidding. I’m kidding.
Before you head out to the store, look around your house for cake candles leftover from previous parties or how about using a twin sheet for a tablecloth? Be creative and you will find that you have to buy less.
At 8:30, my phone beeped and I pounced: a text message that F3 was in the trap. We were headed to Montana.
Code and score assessment and intervention data.
Prints are shipped flat,
The reason I am saying this is to remind everyone to keep praying for the people effected in Alabama. As the media quickly moves on to new stories it is easy to forget that it happened. People are still in shock in many areas. Its is almost a week later and thousand still don't have power or safe water to drink. Keep praying for the people here, and that God would work mightily in the hearts of people effected!
Worship is giving God the best that He has given you. Be careful what you do with the best you have. Whenever you get a blessing from God, give it back to Him as a love-gift. Take time to meditate before God and offer the blessing back to Him in a deliberate act of worship. If you hoard it for yourself, it will turn into spiritual dry rot, as the manna did when it was hoarded (see Exodus 16:20). God will never allow you to keep a spiritual blessing completely for yourself. It must be given back to Him so that He can make it a blessing to others.
“Wait! How do you know who I am! I don’t look like Madison!”
2 - All businesses online need content .
“We appeal to the international community, human rights organisations, United Nations and civilised nations to take notice of such barbaric acts of Pakistani forces against Baloch people and play their important role to put an end to the ongoing full-fledged genocide of Baloch nation by Pakistani forces,” the PR concluded.
Jesus answered them, “I have shown you many good works from my Father. For which of these are you trying to stone me?”
The A to Z Team are all posting the Linky List today. You can sign up here or at any of these blogs--
3-6 Spicy Cilis depending on taste
Lives there now,
~ Christmas decorations for sparkling festive seasons
Now I was so smart and stenciled the little plate border.
relative & relation are adverse to unconditioned
For a while this seemed ok. The bike was a no-brainer. The only frustration was to not actually be going anywhere and then that dumb button that the trainer kept using to increase the resistance. The other alternative torture equipment seemed more attractive. Not only could I listen to tunes, and briskly walk on this moving side-walk, I did not have to do the stuff I do at home when walking around the house (such as stooping and bending to pick up whatever the small fry have dropped, ignored, forgotten to put away…not to mention the path of destruction left in the wake of the teenagers passing through)! My preference overall was the treadmill.
I find this entire conversation extremely funny on so many levels (and I really hope my cousins do too!) - here are just a few.
It is said in the vEdAs, that those who are not (yet) competent must take refuge in the first Vishaya Bhavana. And now the learned (budhah) hold/think (bhAvayEt), any one of these bhAvanAs (and practice it).
Apparently they've been open since last summer 2010, to think I used to live around the corner from the view above, what else is going on in my neighborhood since I've been gone? Suggests?
The movie picks up from the end of the movie “Captain America: The first avenger”. Here’s what happens in short. There are no avengers in the starting. Tony Stark a.k.a Iron Man is busy as ever with making his own life better, Captain America is trying to deal with the new world. Hawkeye is working with Nick Fury, Black Widow is on some mission, Dr. Bruce Banner a.k.a The Hulk is working as a Doctor somewhere in India and Thor’s not on Earth so we don’t know what he’s been doing. Loki is on earth to take the Tesseract (the weird blue cube thing from the former movie that has the special powers and brings nothing good). Nick Fury (Samuel .L. Jackson) brings together all the superheores to bring down Loki. Then there is there is the awesome action sequence of The Avengers Vs Loki’s Army. As you can guess the ending is “The goods guys win”. The movie has a fast pace but its not rushed so you wont feel like your watching on fast forward. Even though its an action movie they have managed to mix the comedy parts perfectly. Nothings out of place and none of the lines are out of order.
I guess that's all I have for now. I'm off to read y'alls blogs. Have a great rest of the week. Take care.
In my lifetime, I have accomplished a few small things that I am proud of. But if I have done so, it is because I stand on the shoulders of giants. My mother was a quiet, loving, gentle Giant with a heart that encompassed all of creation.
has disappeared
It's been a while! Sorry about that! This has been one of those years that I'm just on my toes, running around and working like a dog! Thanks for hanging around this little blog and not giving up on me! We've been working so hard! We started daily 5 but we are taking it very slow. One of the lessons in the book might take me 3 days to get through. But, we are up to 6 minutes of reading to self and 8 minutes of reading to someone. Not to mention that my students groan on the days that I tell them we aren't doing daily 5!
Schrader SM. Longitudinal Studies of Semen Quality of Unexposed Workers: An Update. Presented at the Institute for Environmental Health, University of Cincinnati, Cincinnati, Ohio. April 26, 1989.
Andrews McMeel Publishing
Finally, I took a wide ribbon (2-3 inches) that was about 5 yards long and carefully bound it over the tops of the flags and getting all the flags in a row. Now the banner is basically complete. I sewed long lengths of 1/8 inch ribbon on each end to tie it up.
Finally, be sure to go to your local stores, even if you’ve already checked out their website. Each store is managed separately, so there may be some in-store deals that will not show up on the website. And these deals could be specific to that one store. If you have any open questions, you can ask the employees there. Just be aware that the answers you get from them may be tailored in a way so that they want you to spend more money from their store (they are sales people, of course). So if you get an answer and seem iffy about it, go back home and do research on it. Don’t go to the store without an idea of what you want.
guidance of Michael Fleisher, the realm of Jonah expanded to include Turnbull, Mei Ling, Woodson & Ginny Hex and all the sorrow that accompanied the growing cast of supporting characters. However, under the deft hand of Justin & Jimmy, Jonah Hex has moved from melodrama into out and out tragedy. They have kept the Fleisher contributions, adding their own twists, and brought in
First of all, she doesn’t look right for the job. Andy is by no means fat, or even heavy – but in that world of haute couture, she looks, well, wrong. She’s known as the smart fat girl which is one of the reasons why Miranda Priestly, the doyenne of Runway Magazine, took a chance on her and gave her the job. The other reason is that Emily, now Miranda’s Number One Assistant had previously sent Miranda two previous Number Two Assistants, both of whom crashed and burned, or said another way – were quickly fired.
I waded through this book, hoping that I would eventually be gripped by this tortuous tale, but I’m afraid I gave it up when I was half way through. I am too old to waste time reading books which are uncongenial and meaningless to me. I am glad that Agatha Christie did not continue writing novels like this but returned to writing tales of the detective exploits of Hercule Poirot and Miss Marple in the few remaining years of her life.
But we can’t.
All tracks except "Heart Attack"
Well its back to the grind for me today, well for everybody unless your vacation starts today or its your regular day off or you took the day off or your playing HOOKEY! Anywhoo what ever is going on with you today HAPPY MONDAY to you!! Yesterday I cooked another Pioneer Woman recipe, YUM!!I hope you have popped over to visit Ree's blog. Pure entertainment.
Yes, I've wondered about it so much, which is why I really wanted to do this series. It's so wonderful to hear from other moms and realize that we're all in the same boat, even though our circumstances might be different. I only wish I'd had time to feature many more parents (single moms, moms working in offices, stay-at-home moms, dads, etc.); but like I mentioned last week, this time, I wanted to feature moms who are in similar work situations, so we could see how they've each created very different schedules that work for their families.
Funny thing is my entry comes with a warning: "Beware adult language".
I’ve been being harassed for the recipe for the pull-a-part bread I served at Thanksgiving.
I told you I only passed Higher English on a technicallity. You are the daft one for reading this tirade of tripe.
She really did love it at first though. Maybe she just felt uneasy because she sensed a tsunami coming on?
PISTOL GRIP Stitches Union 13 THE FORGOTTEN DEAD ENDING BLAG DAHLIA KEVIN SECONDS La Plebe Far From Finished
Car Instalment £120
To its credit, the Express ran its correction the day after it published the original.
just as unfair!
Peacock swimsuit, We Are Handsome, £180
Athlete
‘Pambazuka’ in Kiswahili means the dawn or to arise as a verb.
May 26, 2012 10-1pm Cricut Class "Strawberry Favor Basket"
More detail on the drunk driver story: the self-employed painter and decorator who demolished our front wall had been paid for a big job that morning - one thousand pounds in cash. When arrested he had two pound coins on him. Apparently, he had already paid off a couple of people whose cars he had clipped before exiting the pub car-park. Of course, he was driving with no insurance, and in fact had a court case pending for a similar offence, although that one also involved an assault. When it came to trial he was sent down for three months.
CRUSH THEIR BUTTS
A spring clean of the mind!
Why such a good thing? Well.. I can finally match my Devastator themed nails. I posted up a pic of when I TRIED but the Lime was too light, so instead I used the darker green and had a Ninja Turtles themed eyeshadow madness instead. I tried packing the lime on with a wet brush ( Which I’ve never had to do, since all the eyeshadows I have are super super pigmented, including the darker green that’s in the same package as the lime ) At first it didn’t look like it was going to be enough but I kept going. Eventually when I topped it off with just dry shadow I was VERY happy with the outcome. Even decided to try the wet method with the purple for the eyeliner. Let’s just say I’m hooked now. Lmao
It was nearly midnight by the time that we arrived home and the next door neighbour's dog was serenading our little lane with his barking. When I had been getting ready to go out I could not help but hear that the neighbour's dog was barking in a way which indicated that they were away or out and he was obviously outside. Strange that, as when the WAG from next door came round on Christmas Eve she said that the dog had become a house dog and no longer lived outside in the kennel. Well that didn't last long. Anyway we were going out for the evening and I hoped that by the time we came home that the dog would have barked himself to sleep. We went out and forgot all about the barking dog. For once his barking was not going to spoil our evening.
1) Watch only your favorite Star Wars films, in whichever order you feel is best. To go with this year’s theme of ‘simplicity’ I suggest you just enjoy watching whichever films you love the most. If you love all of them, then watch all of them! If you prefer the Original Trilogy over the Prequels, than just watch the Original Trilogy! Yes, you have my permission to totally skip over The Phantom Menace, and the whole Prequel Trilogy if you please – Star Wars Day is about celebrating the best Star Wars has to offer and what it means to you as an individual. And while you’re at it, do George Lucas a favor and fail to acknowledge the Star Wars Christmas Special’s existence.
See- that’s why I make these mistakes. God has decided I don’t have enough talent for the final number and Satan just loves ordering his minions around. Go there, do this. Faster, slower. Right, left. Up, down. Never a dull moment. Never a moment of peace.
assalamualaikum :) & a very good morning to all *since i'm writing this in the morning~
In a small bowl, sift together flour, cocoa powder, baking powder, and salt.
As you enter the brewpub, however, there isn't much to see. It's a cavernous, one room bar with some tables directly on your left, a long bar just past that also on the left, and then some more tables on the right. Various signs and stuff on the wall and some bottles for sale behind the bar.
Which in light of recent events, summer ending, labor day, school starting, politics, weather...make me think
I used to wear these pants a lot in the winter, but this season has been so mild that I’ve only worn them a little more than once a month so far (November, December, and twice in January). I usually pair them with red or neutrals. This time, I’ve picked up the orange in the tweed by accessorizing with this gorgeous, Indian scarf (dupatha).
though I never had dreads
After a few minutes on the treadmill it was determined that I had fairly normal feet and needed a neutral or stability shoe. I ended up buying a pair of Asics GT-2080 which felt good on my feet. I wore these for my first half-marathon and the 2003 Boston Marathon. I had really bad blisters on my toes and lost three toenails after Boston 2003, so I decided I needed to make an adjustment.
Well, for this recipe, I am forgoing the textural desire and going for taste all within keeping down calories and fat, a little. This recipe got a B+ from Calorie Count.
Yep, thanks to Netflix’s ability to stream these episodes, we’re right back knee deep in the big STAR TREK: THE ORIGINAL SERIES watch. (Yeah, I could have watched them at CBS.com, but I don’t like their player.) As I mentioned last time, I’ve never watched TOS all that much before because I always found STAR TREK dreadfully boring as a kid. Watching the first season a half-year ago or so, I discovered I was a really smart kid. STAR TREK is mostly average television and I’m frankly a little stunned that it’s as popular as it has become. Maybe there was just nothing else to watch in the late ’60s so people of that era became super attached to the show, or maybe the greatness of these characters just shines through the largely mediocre, logically-challenged material, but STAR TREK is at times great, at times awful, and largely no more watchable than an average episode of Murder, She Wrote, a show so forgettable that it lasted for 10 or 11 years and no one can remember a single episode without getting it confused with at least three other episodes.
I'm just making this one to have another type of beer to push with my beergas. Cream ales aren't the ones that I drink all that often. Still, summertime gets hot and a cream ale might be a nice change from the Chocolate Stout.
Cue them up
Instead of a knee-jerk condemnation of anything proposed by a Conservative Chancellor of the Exchequer the Welsh Management should make this the starting-point from which to improve tourism in Wales, to deliver the 'quality tourism' we always hear about. It should bring in its own legislation to gradually phase out large caravan sites in favour of serviced accommodation. Thereby both cleaning up our coasts and countryside and also creating jobs that caravan sites can never provide.
LOCATION: Centre for Social Innovation, 215 Spadina Ave. Suite 400 (The Innovation Lab)
We thought when we was cruisin’ with the top down it was sweet. With nowhere in particular to go, we’d go sometimes as far out as California Crossing and sometimes out to the Little League field (and it was when we and they were seniors), which was sweet. At the same time our parents worried ‘bout us gittin’ mixed up with the wrong crowd but little did they know that Lucky and me was the wrong crowd. And we had our reputations to protect, so we’d sneak off, go to the Little League field, where I smoked my first cigarette and drank bathtub rum from a flask I kept hidden in a special place under the dash of my 1929 Ford convertible. And as I was tooling around in a dream, half-dozing as I drove, I thought I knew what the future held for me but I didn’t see how my small town would grow into a midsize city and how I could’ve taken advantage of it if I could’ve seen that far ahead. Jake! Jake! I couldn’t wait to git grown. With my spurs and deep base voice, I’d learn to ride a horse. Yes, this was before zoning came to my hometown. And way before television. And lo, when we boys was looking for somethin to do we’d drive down to the levy. Now, it was sweet to go fishin’; now who went fishin’ to catch fish. When look, we was boys and when boys was boys, I must admit that we liked to hunt. Ah, the unlimited space for chicken and cows and horses ‘till the town grew too big (that was my folks opinion, not mine ‘cause I had as much ambition as the next guy). Who would ever dream our little town would git so big? If we had, we would’ve bought up as much property as possible. Yes, we would’ve, that’s who. Blessed assurance and Jesus was mine, we was religious too. Yes, Lucky who so often held sway over me. Lucky, who often convinced me to do something wrong. Me! Me prompted by a pro. He in his beret and his old dark brown velvet coat, with fake fur trim, yes fur (remember it gits quite cold there in the winter), and he’d talk me into drivin’ north to the California Crossing Bridge and, after we crossed it, to the Bloody Bucket. Only we was too young to git in the Bloody Bucket. Oh, what a painful realization it was when we found out that we couldn’t git in the Bloody Bucket.
Over the next two months, my goal is to be organized in my karate training. I started a personal karate training log. I considered using this blog as a place to record my training. I decided against it because the post format would be cumbersome to scroll through. I decided to create a spreadsheet. I set up a separate worksheet for karate and kobudo. The far left column lists the name of the form - 19 open hand kata and 27 kobudo kata (8 different weapons). The rows across the top are separated by week.
Beth: Miles 25.5-26.2, My iPhone dies. Haha. The music stops which is no big deal. Yes, I run with it but a lot of the time it is just background noise for me. I know I’m getting closer to seeing my cheer squad again. Right around mile 26 I see my dad with his camera then I see my mom! Brent stepped out and gave me a high five before I made one of the first curves to the finish line. I had this! I just had to finish! I crossed that finish line with my hands in the air! I did it! I AM A MARATHONER! I knew I had finished just barely in a time that I had been hoping for – I wanted to cry and good Lord, I’ve never had so much trouble walking!
Keep the Money Clean - Akoo Nana & Castro
Four of the needed titles are for books in a series that includes books by other writers and have to fit into the greater scheme of things. They are rather formulaic and only one is proving at all difficult.
New title.
12:40pm CST
The first of today’s images for this week’s Words to Live By is a Maya Angelou quote and it is one I love.
Given that he’s a man who loves his hip-hop as much as his funk and soul, it’s no surprise that Crane ends up at the place where G Love, The Beastie Boys and indeed his own band intersect. The album is a walk through the garden of P-Funk, Oldschool Hip-Hop, Dr.John´s Voodooed landscapes as well as Gospel Hymns and Soul/Garage 60´s style.
In order for the garden to be sustainable through the winter you need to plant a lot, and know how to store it. Last year I had about 12 tomato plants for 2 people. That’s a lot of tomatoes, and they’d rot if I didn’t preserve them. My favorite way of persevering is drying. I dried pounds of tomatoes and zucchini which I then froze in single serving. Their great in all sorts of dishes.
In small saucepan stir sugar and corn syrup and put over medium heat until sugar reaches hard candy point (300 degrees on candy thermometer). Stir in desired gel food coloring and pour into the center of the baked cookie. Repeat this in various colors to achieve the same effect as our cookies.
When my children were young, I read to them. Later, they read to themselves books that I helped them choose. We looked for books that entertained and maybe even educated a little bit. We homeschooled, so often the books we read were textbooks or fiction recommended by the curriculum writers to correspond with or at least compliment their other subjects. Because we listened to the recommendations of people we respected, I had no fears about the books my children read. I knew they would not read something that was contrary to our lifestyle; that they would learn good character traits and often even learn something spiritual along the way.
Why is purple the color of domestic violence?
Megan – 70 (27.03%)
While on vacation, I received a request from HG World to audition for one of their upcoming shorts, which is a huge honor in my opinion. I just sent the auditions for four roles. Hopefully this could lead to future appearances on that awesome show.
Oh, I hope you enjoyed my day as much as I did. There is not time or the room to mention ALL my friends today, but I so appreciate you all! Your comments make my day, boost my self esteem, make me feel like I'm part of a wonderful community of friends. It's been such fun creating with you today!
“…evolution and creationism can go together showing creationism might not be so wrong.” Yes, they could go together, but the people who are proposing that have not provided their evidence, when they are proposing a claim that goes against nearly everything that has been gathered in favour of evolution. However, what I was talking about when I said that Creationists want to invade the schools, is that they don’t want to blend the two, they want to completely get rid of what they see as a threat to the fairytales they believe in. They want pseudoscience taught as fact. They want things that are demonstrably wrong to be taught as if they are real, like the universe being made in six days or that there was a global flood, ALL of which has no evidence behind it, but they still want it in the classrooms, not alongside evolution, not blended with evolution, but in place of evolution. However, I would much prefer that the Hindu or Zoroastrian creation myths be taught than the Abrahamic ones. They are much more interesting, but completely contrary to what the Jews, Christians, and Muslims believe about where the universe came from.
Diameter : 14.80mm
I know it sounds like heresy for a geek these days to say: I prefer the Fifties’ version to the Eighties’.
A familiar figure emerges next to me and clutches my arm. Young Master leans in towards my ear and whispers fervently, ‘Minerva, we must go. This place isn’t safe. We can talk more on the boat.’
However, you lot all know about the horrors, so I'm not going to bang on about it.
As a reader, I've never been much for description and setting. I like dialog and crisp prose. That's my taste. But what I'm looking for in a book really varies. Some days, I pick up an adult category romance, because I want a fairly predictable love story that will keep me smiling the whole way through. Other days, I go for a complex YA dystopian that is going to make me think and imagine.
Her kingdom is still to come.
A ruler is expected to protect the people, not steal from them or kill them. It’s like the fox guarding the chicken-coop. The shepherd protects the sheep from the wolf, so what can be said of shepherds who have their own wolves? The shepherd should protect his herd from being devoured by the wolves. He protects his herd, and watches over it with vigilance. But when he himself turns into a wolf, devouring the herd… We are seeing more and more of this in our lives, I’m sad to say: The fox guards the chicken-coop. The people will be hungry while his belly is full. People starve, while he grows fat from eating all that flesh of God’s creatures.
Thoughts? opinions? magic tales of flying purple hippos who fight the rouge unicorns? let me know peeps
I'm past the halfway point of my year in France. It's hard to wrap my head around, but in just 4 months I'll be returning to California. It's bittersweet for me, but I know I have many more adventures to come. Til then mes amis, I'll try to keep ya updated via my blog! Hope you enjoy! love and miss you all!!!
They can live underwater for days without breathing
3birds trees- 3-d stickers & the larger tree was cut from one of the tweet trimmings borders
Guinsoo: Something about hallucinations and confronting evil.
What is happening to me? The past few years have certainly seen this movement towards a very quiet life. I seem to be incapable of handling the way people swarm like bees, the hum of their conversation, the screeching punctuation of those who seek attention above the din. I CRAVE silence like a junkie. I am angry tonight because my neighbors are once again out on their postage stamp of a patio laughing it up like cancer has left the planet, and joblessness was soooo yesterday, and my son has not been spending his first four hours in Los Angeles on his bike, waiting for someone to let him on the couch. That sounds so jaded! I am angry at myself for being jaded. But I have weight. There are incredible weights...held, released, thrown, purposed, unpurposed. I used to drown them out. I suppose now I am facing them head to head, and distraction is just another semester to a diploma long past due. Noise was a deluge to thought. (Drown those dirty rats!)
I have been on a bread-bake-a-thon recently, so I thought I’d make some and provide you with a recipe. Ever since I started baking my own bread, I have sworn never to buy it again as it is just so delicious. Bought buns – like bread – are just shadow of their former selves, says Jane Grigson: ‘Until you make spiced hot cross buns yourself…it is difficult to understand why they should have become popular. Bought, they taste so dull. Modern commerce has taken them over, and, in the interests of cheapness, reduced the delicious ingredients to a minimum – no butter, little egg, too much yellow colouring, not enough spice, too few currants and bits of peel, a stodgy texture instead of a rich, light softness. In other words, buns are now a doughy filler for children.’
Awesome hardcover copy of all three LOTR books in one! As Tolkien intended it. I’ve been wanting to get one of these for a long time, but they’re always very expensive. So I found this one on ebay, basically brand new, and with a cover that I had never seen in stores. Including shipping, it ran me $13. That is score that cannot even be MEASURED.
You MUST include "PACKAGE" in the special instructions!!
OK, things have been a bit quiet on the cake front lately. What with work, children, that kind of thing. So inevitably there was some question in the office 'where have Coops' cakes gone?!'.
In addition to improving the experience of urban children in public education and promoting environmental sustainability, Corps members receive year-round training, mentoring, and career development from leading professionals in the growing fields of environmental education, green schoolyard design, energy efficiency and conservation, water resources, and the urban agriculture and local food movements. Armed with these unique insights and experiences, it is our goal for this new generation of leaders to leave the program with a vision for their unique roles within the environmental sustainability, public education, or other related fields.
“We’ll leave you alone for a few minutes,” said the director who we had now met. He, Cely and Miguel, Cely’s work partner, hovered behind our chairs, not actually leaving us alone.
30. Your summer? commencing
"Types of Protection Available via the PCT in PCT Contracting States" is available from the World intellectual Property Organization here.
To learn, to discover.
Indeed, my plotting process has evolved somewhat from its younger state:
Global relocations are on the increase and we are actively recruiting Relocation Consultants. We offer the right candidates a great part-time opportunity to use their expat living and moving experiences and be a part of our dynamic team to help our clients' international employees and their families settle into Dubai or Abu Dhabi.
Today is Saturday 23 July, and with our friend Ian we are heading to the Merchant City Festival. See http://www.merchantcityfestival.com/
Sp in lieu of a purchased ballet set, and since her lessons are, in fact, FREE...we improvised and made our own ballet tutu.
You are the greatest blessing I’ve ever had! It has been such a joy to watch you grow, learn and develop these past 15 months. Every where I take you people compliment me on your behavior. You are usually very quiet and the noise you do make is pleasant, joyful noise. You hardly ever fuss, scream or cry in public (or at home). You are just such a happy little girl.
* Should you include if you’ve been shortlisted in major competitions? Some say it shows the work is better than average, others that it wasn't good enough to win so it reflects badly.
It's choppy and messy and easy.
The backs are similar to the popular 1967 set, except yellow instead of green and are vertical just as they were in 1966 with the typical stats, biography and fun trivia questions and answers,see how many you can get right.
Lastly, they discuss if perhaps they should give Isabelle's painting to Mr. Popper, since, if it stays at William's place, it might get damaged during a party.
It’s looking life in the eye, and listening to what it has to tell you.
2 continuation
It spoke to me and I knew that it absolutely was the storage solution I had been waiting for, for the entire 10 years we have lived in our home. Sure, it's a little on the pricey side for this gal, however, it hasn't been regretted one day since it came home with us.
Circuit length 2.892 miles/4.655km
May 20:New Moon and partial solar eclipse at 5:48 PM Mountain Daylight Time. This is a very intense time that can bring breakage, conflict, change and potent fuel for your dreams and bids for power. You can infuse your commitment with this solar energy, which represents the masculine. Use this time wisely as anything that passes through your thoughts and feelings will be magnified. Stay away from known conflict and negative situations. The quality is fiery and explosive and will be fueled by the winds of change.
back to Ms. Lee not only did she find out she had breast cancer, got a double mastectomy, her husband passes away suddenly from cancer - all her heartache, all the chemo, all the radiation, the healthy diet, taking care of her disable son, ect - this "cancer" has no discriminatory targets
The full dress to be similar to that now in use, excepting that the lappells and cuffs are in future to he white, laced as at present, with a crown over an anchor on the button.
Let's just say we had some nice Food Babies at our house yesterday on Thanksgiving. I'm hoping to give mine up for adoption today.
The universe of this manga is amazingly detailed. Not only does Isayama-sensei provide detailed maps and descriptions of the walled town Eren and his friends live in, he also provides information on the titans themselves along with the design of the soldier’s equipment. I thought that that was a nice touch, and helped make the universe of the manga more real.
I am going to be at Dick Blick for their Blick madness sale in Philadelphia PA on Thursday demoing some manga with Copic markers. If you live in the area you should come in and say hi, ask some questions and watch me work.
I was recently asked a question about painful stitches/perineum after childbirth and thought it would be useful to share my reply.
Put the brownies back in the oven for 5 minutes. Once the brownies are done, cool the brownies before cutting into pieces. Then enjoy!
i wasted my life trying to be someone
I'm off to pick up Carter from school and run Justin to the doc for allergy tests. Let's hope for good results! I always get antsy before a testing appointment. So hard not to get my hopes up that the results will be negative at last. Maybe this year?? Probably not, though...
As we crossed the bridge and entered the town, traffic still moved at a crawl. The road was littered with chunks of broken concrete and scores of rocks of all sizes. Folk in this dusty town stood on the side of the road watching the slow motorcade of northbound vehicles. I don’t know how you say “dour” in Spanish, but the adjective fit the line of onlookers. There were no tires on fire, but that was a sight I was expecting to see.
My father loved more than anything to
...Quick, cut the satellite link!
Time letters has been cut out with my Gazelle, paper Memories. I have used the Weathered Clock die by Tim Holtz/Sizzix for the clock (paper 1922). The butterfly has been cut out with the same paper using a Martha Stewart butterfly punch. I added some Distress Stickles Rock Candy to make it sparkle. Roses from Wild Orchid Crafts.
I had some clean old baby food jars laying around so I poured in some olive oil and added in the garlic paste:
Emma: But Giffy! Papa's the best prince ever!
Your manners teach your children about good manners.
another DT post - but to just tease you alittle bit - here is whats coming this evening !
Mr. Mooney and Kiki spent all of their time together. They even slept in the same bed. Well, she slept in Mr. Mooney's bed and he is entirely too polite to kick her out. So he slept next to her on the floor.
President Obama's tactics are pretty clear. None of this is an accident
Like I said before, you never know who is reading your blog, but something funny happened. In the midst of all the chaos, somehow I was able to get my good friend Chef Pallardy to go introduce himself. While they were chatting about being chef's and what not, before he walked away I was able to say, "Hey Chef, just wanted to say my 7 year old daughter loved your roasted bone marrow at Bar Symon last night."
May 17 – Hawaiian Village (Tampa, FL) *
These Asian countries pulled out tons and tons of gold from this deposit, and fashioned it into all sorts of wondrous treasures.
Given that I'm still in a state of shock at the experience (not really, I'm just overwhelmed with other stuff), the interview will serve as this week's post! How's that for a neat cop-out?
Dahlias and mint all round then.
Mom prefer mums? Grandma kind of daisy-crazy? Whether you tailor your bouquet to a loved one’s favorites or go occasion-oriented with seasonal or holiday sprays, Teleflora hand-delivers your budding beauties so they make it to their destination every time.
Our allotment is on a double slope so it drains really well. We also have a micro climate here compared to the local area, we always get good weather, most days are bright and sunny during the summer and the temperature is fairly consistent . On a good year – unlike last year ( not consistently warm enough) we can grow chillies and peppers outside and last year we managed to grow some aubergines. Butternut squash always grows well.
We each stood our ground
Reuniting Banderas with Salma Hayek (voice of Kitty Softpaws) causes this film to largely echo Desperado, in which the pair previously co-starred. Fortunately, they work well together and make a good on-screen couple. Even at 90 minutes, the movie feels like a long-running television episode. It’s cute and funny from beginning to end, but doesn’t have the substance that most recent animated films have demonstrated. On the other hand, it’s amusing to see the human-like cats have retained so many of their feline traits, including lapping milk and cleaning themselves. It’s not going to capture your hearts and imaginations the way a Disney/Pixar picture does, but it’s an enjoyable nonetheless.
If you would like to show your appreciation and support for what I'm doing here at The House of Vines there are a number of different things that you can do:
Beacon Hill has sent me back to the fray with some new strength. I’ve learned how Valley Street can wend up to higher ground. Places of respite are way-stations. These are places in which it is possible to stop, gather, and rejuvenate so that the pilgrimage of trust on earth may be taken up again. Intermissions seem all-too-brief, but it is consoling to know of many refuges that are easy to reach. Last week reminded me to notice discoveries in all forms. The Quaker community, through many spirited conversations, reminded me of kindred spirits. When you think you may have become as jaded as this culture appears to be, you can discover that it is still possible to experience wonder, and that is helped by seeing wonder in others around you. I’ve found myself reading and writing in silence more than before- and to write more slowly. On the northbound return train, my thoughts turned to friendships, newness and excavated finds in the old and familiar. New directions on the old way home.
Mix milk, yeast and half of the sugar. Leave to prove. Sift the flour and mix it with salt, lemon zest and the other half of sugar. Add the eggs at room temperature, the yeast-milk mixture and knead into a sticky dough. Lastly add the melted butter. Transfer the dough to an oiled bowl and cover with a damp cloth. Leave to rise for an hour or an hour and a half, until it has doubled in size.
In this park, there are some interesting sculptures. From my vantage point, all I can see are a thin dark line against the white snow, so I know there is something. When on the ground, I can see them. Honestly, I think they are more interesting from up above! LOL
Next, we had some student presenters give small talks (as make up work for missing class) on various subjects. The first student talked about marketing as it relates to brewpub/breweries. The second gave a talk on the calculation of ABV from specific gravities and its relation to the density of ethanol and water. The third gave some history on just a few breweries/brewpubs in PA.
As your heart opens and becomes stronger, positive heart felt feelings grow and this automatically reduces any negative emotions. You are better able to deal with stress, and in daily life are much calmer, more peaceful and happy.
To play up our Renaissance Faire themed mystery, we are visiting Renaissance fairs and festivals this fall. We have Renaissance clothing and even created a banner with the cover art that can be displayed at the festivals because it's made of cloth. We made up a simple game we can play with would-be book buyers at the festivals that incorporates elements of the story.
Horse and Rider
Written for boys, this is a book that girls won’t be afraid to read, even though there aren’t many female characters. Tweener boys will find this book hard to put down. Discussion questions are included at the end of the book. $6.95. 151 pages.
And he gave a snore infernal;
My baby boy, my little Wyatt belongs to the Lord. It didn't matter if he lived or died, he still belongs to the Lord. So why was I so selfish to ask him to live while suffering? Because I thought wrong. I thought the way one would if they were living for themselves alone, thinking only of themselves. Today it was brought to my attention that we all live and die for the Lord.
While you're there, you might like to have a look at Connie's charming little short story for children, Farmer Ted's Easy Day, available free of charge all the time.
And that’s exactly the point; which the author promptly misses. For it is the God-given right of every man to have his way with whichever woman he chooses: “We live in 2012 when men increasingly have no rights,” says the author. “Too many a woman thinks that somehow men are a source of unfairness and trouble in the world.”
Surprise! Here's an obscure Christmas album with a horrible cover. The pressing is crap with several little dimples in the wax.
Mike Fuller: 2. During The Amendment. There Will Be A Vote Of The Congress In September Because It Is Necessary For Our Immigration Policy!
If the answer were “yes” to those questions, then President Obama would be running for re-election based on his achievements…and rightly so. But because he has failed, he will run a campaign of diversions, distractions, and distortions. That kind of campaign may have worked at another place and in a different time. But not here and not now. It’s still about the economy …and we’re not stupid.
Eventually, mom turned to a friend she had met through her work. This woman had survived more than three decades as a prostitute, after being recruited by a man she thought loved her when she was just 14.
Which is ... what we should all be doing with every scene we write. Easier said than done, I know, but a drabble is a perfect place to practice.
We were all talking about our dreams for the city, and why there needs to be a space for young people to gather, create and collaborate and showcase their talent which will also enrich the culture of our place. As pointed out, we happen to be living in a city that has creativity and art deeply ingrained in our culture. We need a space where the creativity in people can breathe.
Listening right now is a huge issue for us. As in he doesn’t. At all. Or pretends to, but does something else entirely. So you ask him to do something and his response is to ignore you. You repeat yourself several times. No response. Or my favorite response: spitting. Or something else that’s just poor manners.
Pride of place goes to Kemal’s lover’s 4,213 cigarette butts, lovingly dated, archived and gently pinned to a canvas that occupies a full wall. Pamuk described the painstaking process of vacuuming out the tobacco to prevent worms.
Riley was hoping to trap a simple Biblio-Fiend making a nuisance of itself at the library -- one of her first traps on her own -- but instead of making a name for herself as a decent trapper she's ended up all over the web in a video that makes her look like a total spaz. You know, books flying, shelves toppling, the Biblio nearly escaping.
“It was my way of gaining your trust, idiot. The only reason I didn’t fuck Elijah up as well is because we reached a mutual agreement. He helps me with setting you up, and my baby stays safe.”
“Listed Title of the Clip.” Commercial. Date it was posted. YouTube. Date you accessed it.
Attempted an old song, then realized why I hadn’t finished it back when I started it. I was approaching the song from a One-dimensional perspective and needed to take it somewhere or let it take me. Dylan refers to a lot of songs of his as having been written because of an image in his head. I had the image in my head, and the memory. I’d just been wrongly interpreting what the image meant. Did not finish that song though.
At 2.30am DBKL begin to put down plastic barricades and ordered cars that were parked along the historic square to move.
it, but don’t let it blow your t-rex minds!! First, we have this
"The Nobel committee has to admit they are in the minority, the Chinese people and the overwhelming majority of people in the world are against this. The decision of the Norwegian Nobel Committee does not represent the wish of the majority of the people in the world, particularly that of the developing countries... This is not an issue of human rights; it is an issue of interference of internal affairs... Liu Xiaobo broke Article 105, a crime of instigating the subversion of state power. He went beyond general criticism of the state..."
Change will alter the threat calculus for Islamists, from an international, intercultural or global realm, to one that is confined to individual states or communities. Instead of preparing Jihad against America and the West who—in the extremists view—support oppressive regimes and seek to destroy Islam, their efforts will shift towards the more urgent struggle for power within their own countries.
Bear cubs are really cute! I love bears above all animals, they have appealled to me since I was a little child. My best friend was a (teddy) white bear cub that I still have. In Spain, brown bears are endangered species and nowadays can be only found in National Parks in the Cantabrian Mountains. This little one however lives freely and happily in the Estonian forests.
Under ObamaCare, a single committee—the United States Preventative Services Task Force—is empowered to evaluate preventive health services and decide which will be covered by health-insurance plans.
During the back half of the second set, when a crowd of your own fans has filled in a bit more, you finally get fed up and cocky when this same guy is surprisingly yet not paired with a mate, and sends out another call: “Free Birrrrrrrrrd!”
Eleanor of Aquitaine by Alison Weir. This was for the History category in the Mixing It Up challenge. I have still to review it so won't say too much. It was good although not the best history book I have ever read.
Al Austin is that Man!
3.) The kind that knocks you out enough to do nothing and no longer care. At all.
My sister and her husband, along with their 4 children have spent the past 2 1/2 years in a jungle of Peru. O how I have missed her calls, her voice, her encouragement, her energy and her passion for Jesus! As soon as their plane flew into our hometown this month, I loaded all my kids up in the car and we drove to my parents house at midnight to welcome them home! We absolutely couldn't wait until morning! As soon as I pulled up into the driveway.... We all jetted out of the truck and burst open the front door to get our hugs! All the kids were so grown up, yet each of them looked the same, talked the same and had the same personality! The jungle had not changed them ...it brought the joy of Jesus right out of them!!!! They were so mature and lively!!! O to hear the children squeal with delight at seeing their cousins again! To see the boys wrestling on the carpet, to watch the little girls play doll house, to listen to the stories of their wild journeys!
If the driver was driving intoxicated, you may still be able to file a claim with their insurance company, if you can identify the driver.
Sometimes, I devote this space to a critique of websites. Occasionally, I’ve ventured farther afield, reviewing everything from the literary merit of the operating instructions for a box fan, to movies (“Avatar was beamed through a projector”), to decades (absolutely loved The Aughts). I’ve even evaluated the worthiness of entire nations, for example giving England eight ampersands on a scale of one to ten, since the British isle is shaped like an ampersand and I very much enjoyed my 2005 visit there.
Oh, thanks so much to both of you for stopping by every week on CB this May! Each Thursday was such a delight - please know you're always welcome back!
They are marsupials, which means they are a special mammal that give birth to a tiny baby called a joey, which is no bigger than a jelly bean. It climbs up from the birth canal into a pouch and finds a teat to hang onto for the next six months . Can you see her pouch opening which has a draw string muscle?
I often remember
There are three Persons in the Godhead. Matt. 3:16; Matt. 28:19; 2 Cor. 13:14; John 14:16; John 15:26; and Ephesians 2:18.
My life seems so up and down. I am only 22 years old, no children, recently single, unemployed, paying for gas and car insurance, but it feels as though I am going through a mid life crisis. I don’t know what I am doing wrong, while in nursing school I had a great sense of self-worth. Like my life had the most meaning, I would make a comfortable living, while doing the most important service to the world saving lives and promoting wellness. Once I begin working in a assisted living, I was overwhelmed with the pressure of critically thinking every moment, treating every patient as if it was me, being face to face with death. People passing on everyday, I became very stressed, not to mention I had just brought a car (a used, twenty year old Lincoln, a good choice then I wonder what the hell I was thinking now…lol), my mother thought I was making good money so that meant paying a bill in the house. Gee-sh sounds like a lot and it was. I was only 19 at the time, I went from going out to the club, hanging out with friends, being treated like a baby (I’m next to the baby but my baby sister treats me like I am the youngest), to a full blown world of stress and responsibility. Ooh and did I tell you I am super sensitive, I believe in expressing my feelings, and I can’t hide or hold back the tears when someone hurts me.
We made it to camp and had a great time, but that evening I had a picture in my mind of myself running all over tending to all kinds of things: some necessary, some that I just chose to add on. And in my running around trying to take care of everything else, I dropped the ball on the simple thing I should’ve taken care of first.
In thinking about how to write this review, I was really torn on how, exactly, to approach it. On the outset, "The Ancient Dogoo Girl" delivers exactly what was advertised in the promo clip I posted to Youtube, that has been viewed 133,000 times, a big breasted Japanese girl, bouncing around fighting monsters.
This is mostly a post for Gregory, who isn't watching Fringe yet.
The best thing about the new slide plate was that I was able to try the machine out properly and she works!! She feels so much more solid than my modern machine. I still need to fiddle around with the tension slightly but apart from that she is as good as new!
The net upshot was that the creativity, which got a second wind on that night in 1985, took about another three years before it started fully expressing itself. But ever since I have been just blessed with ideas after ideas, and lots of problems have been solved—the problem of cognition, perception, biological evolution, mind-body healing. My latest book is called Physics of the Soul. This is a theory of reincarnation, all fully worked out. It has been just a wonderful adventure in creativity.
Tender octopus and seasoned really well. This had a Spanish flair and I really enjoyed it. The potatoes lent a nice starchy bite to the plate. They give you alot of octopus I was happy to see.
Not that she'll ever read my little ol' blog, but THANK YOU, REE!!!
To get persons who take like apple ipods, phones, or another variety of gadgets, search for a travelling bag owning pockets and also storage area fleshlight sleeves pertaining to like widgets. While moving about for the leather case, analyze on an interior lining from the case. A new line's performance would be to put off this leather via spreading colouring for household leather satchel bag items. The liner in such hand bags should be well prepared involving outstanding quality fabric. Products or services household leather solution out there, find all set in order to characteristically attend to most of these household leather satchel carrier having suitable preservation in addition to toning down equipment. You need to abide by company's maintenance strategies before you go for any cleansing technique of household cambridge satchel leather satchel carrier.
The news about the nomination came around the same time as I heard about Company magazines re-launch. The clutch sized cutie includes a fantastic selection of the best 'what-to-wear-now' pieces and it was quite fun seeing many familiar blogger faces throughout the pages. A special shout-out for reader Katie, featured in the horoscopes, who said she turns to 5 inch and up for style advice!
One of my favorite, inexpensive places to find a plethora of images is old yearbooks. I picked these 2 up a little while ago at a local antique mall for about $30 for the pair. They are from 1929 and 1938. They are the same school, in 1929 known as Colorado Agricultural College, in 1938 known as Colorado State College, and now known as Colorado State University in Fort Collins.
I have a ton of great stuff to add from the past few months I have just been extremely busy. I have a few beers from the Bahamas, there are some great ones down there to go with Conch. Quite a few new ones from here in Utah, and I also had to make a trip to Wyoming and tried some stuff from Wind River that was quite good as well, and that is a little closer than Freeport or Nassau to go on a beer run.
"We must, however, be careful not to get caught up in the hysterics and display of outrage," Ngwenya told protestors. "Only those who knew him, his community and family, are truly in mourning."
You learn that you can transfer your ouwne picture to make stamps.
Binyon
You may enter as many times as you like using different project
#2 spent some time painting a cooler for a fraternity function. She really did a great job. We have all decided that she needs to paint us a family cooler instead of spending so much time on coolers for other people and giving them away.
Carry a sturdy walking stick to be used as a weapon is necessary.
The study, by itself, might well have some value. This is a phrase I could use in a referee report on a paper addressing questions that, in my opinion, aren’t quite as pressing as the authors think. Sure, one could inquire whether schizophrenia might be to certain types of creative thought as the obsessive-compulsive disorder is to persistence, or clinical depression to feeling the blues, or cancer to normal cell growth for that matter. What’s objectionable is that this particular question is taken out of context, sensationalized and belaboured to no end, at the expense of just about every other aspect of our work and lives. People outside of science or academia can get into long and detailed arguments about how John Nash’s schizophrenia influenced his creative output. (OK, so that’s one movie there.) These are the same people who think that mathematicians do all their work on computers, that calculus and trigonometry are areas of current research, that we get paid gazillions in royalties for all those journal publications, and that if tenure track jobs start in September then you should apply in August.
Most of the other rich nations have agreed to curbs under the United Nation’s “Kyoto Protocol” but President George W. Bush pulled out of Kyoto in 2001, saying it would be too costly and wrongly exclude developing nations.
5) The escape books offer me.
And now for the colour - independent and local brewers are reporting growth, on average, of 7.5% year-on-year, because they are enthusiastically investing in their brands which have genuine local provenance and are brewed in their country of origin, in many cases just down the road from where they are being drunk.
"Sure, as long as it's got nothing to do with water!"
But the Ratner group was courting a different constituency. Bruce Bender and James P. Stuckey, executive vice presidents of the development company, studied the opposition, sending assistants to take notes at public meetings or doing it themselves. Mr. Bender has decades of experience as a City Council aide, notably as chief of staff to the former speaker, Peter F. Vallone. Mr. Stuckey is a former president of the Public Development Corporation and a longtime adviser to Mr. Giuliani. They also hired Joe DePlasco of Dan Klores Communications, a former top aide to Mark Green, to handle public relations.
The story itself is still gripping- circumstances force four children to become locked in a bedroom, at the mercy of their unloving grandmother. The moments of happiness they eke out are sweet, and the tragedies become even sadder as their mother withdraws farther into her new life.
A week or so ago, my hubby prepared this super yummy dish for me and I knew I just had to share it with y'all. The recipe can be found here (if you don't already own this cookbook, I highly recommend it...super easy, yummy recipes):
Today's post is super long and full of pictures but I'm sure you'll feel quite satisfied when you're done. LOL!! At Magnolia Down Under we want to see your 3D or papertole projects. I didn't go crazy with this challenge and only added 2 butterflies that are 3D on to my tent card.
Lowlights – I cannot remember any of the in house stuff. Oh yeah, this weeks fighting hairy bloke (see above) has a friend on Cruz’s team. His friend would not give up his fighting secrets. Respect.
I doubt Pritchett will ever get this letter, though I’d like to be proved wrong. Garbage should be picked up an carted off so vermin can’t breed in it, however, and so I offer my response below
There was no rest for the weary this year though.
can write "the street was lined with small shops," but you have to be present to say, "Jewelers Row had long since spilled over its original street, and now several blocks were crammed with tiny shops offering wares ranging from cut gems the size of pigeon's eggs to mass-produced tourist charms
So I decided to look around the hotel,
i picked this out of someone's trash last spring. it was in pretty bad shape and all of the drawers were destroyed. but the frame is in good shape. the shelves (drawer bottom bases) in there are just made of cardboard so i plan on replacing them with mdf. the inside is going to be painted creamy white and the outside with annie sloan paris grey. i have removed the back of the piece and will replace that with beadboard. it is in progress as we speak....
Springbok vice-captain Victor Matfield dominated the lineouts, which enabled his team to build a solid foundation.
Interview shoots are very unforgiving. This is a situation in which you must get everything right first time and make the job flow smoothly and comfortably for everyone involved. Interviews will quickly fall apart if things start going wrong or taking a long time. Therefore competent operators should be able to organise and shoot interviews in their sleep. It is a skill which must be second nature, so you should be well practiced in this art before you attempt a “mission-critical” interview.
a strong opinion? (leslie can certainly relate to that! ha! i, on the other hand am as mild as a lamb *wink*wink*)
Rated higher than the sense is the ‘mind’. The mind is infinite; its desires are many. But the capacity of the senses to enjoy is small. This imbalance in the system will remain. Greed is wanting more and more sensory objects – even though a person can eat only so much, he wants all the chocolates in the world; though the amount (of money) that can be spent by an individual during a lifetime is limited, he wants all the wealth in the world. This is greed. This is what is prevalent in the world today.
- price includes ingredients and equipment, but please bring an apron
The year is 2046. Haruyuki Arita is a young boy who finds himself on the lowest social rungs of his school. Ashamed of his miserable life, Haruyuki can only cope by indulging in virtual games. But that all changes when Kuroyukihime, the most popular girl in school, introduces him to a mysterious program called Brain Burst and a virtual reality called the Accel World.
Also, whether or not you're entering the pick me comp, I NEED YOUR HELP to fill a space in my diary for May 31st. So, what I'd like you to do is ask me some questions. I'll answer them all in a post on May 31st. I'll need tham by Sunday, please. Hurry!!
Luckily for us we were able to book our tickets during the Cebupacific promo fare season. Our round trip tickets total cost was Php 5,433.32 (for 2).
I just love a good re-idea. Little stacks in saltine cracker packs. I'm pretty sure I have finished off an entire sleeve of the old design in the past, but I shouldn't have. I had been craving these and was happy to see they are now in these easy to manage packs and with sea salt. I bought them from CVS today like a granny.
A private investigator has been unable to find the only eyewitness to the sudden death of media innovator and conservative activist Andrew Breitbart.
